MN Fashions Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy describes how your personal information is collected, used, and shared when you visit or make a purchase from
www.virgo-boutique.com
(the “Site”).
Please note that, while MN Fashions trading as
www.virgo-boutique.com
makes all possible efforts to protect our customers’ privacy, we would like to make customers aware that information disclosed while connected to the Internet may be transferred to the
www.virgo-boutique.com
servers over a publicly available telecommunications network.
www.virgo-boutique.com
cannot be held responsible, and accepts no liability, for unauthorised access to the public network beyond its control. All information provided by customers is done entirely at the customers’ own risk.
PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT
When you visit the Site, we automatically collect certain information about your device, including information about your web browser, IP address, time zone, and some of the cookies that are installed on your device. Additionally, as you browse the Site, we collect information about the individual web pages or products that you view, what websites or search terms referred you to the Site, and information about how you interact with the Site. We refer to this automatically-collected information as “Device Information.”
We collect Device Information using the following technologies:
COOKIES
Cookies allow us to give you a much more personalised shopping experience. Here is some information about cookies and ways that we and our third party providers like shopify use them.
- “Cookies” are data files that are placed on your device or computer and often include an anonymous unique identifier. For more information about cookies, and how to disable cookies,
CLICK HERE
- “Log files” track actions occurring on the Site, and collect data including your IP address, browser type, Internet service provider, referring/exit pages, and date/time stamps.
- “Web beacons,” “tags,” and “pixels” are electronic files used to record information about how you browse the Site.
Here is a list of cookies that we use. We’ve listed them here so you can choose if you want to opt-out of cookies or not.
_session_id, unique token, sessional, Allows Shopify to store information about your session (referrer, landing page, etc).
_shopify_visit, no data held, Persistent for 30 minutes from the last visit, Used by our website provider’s internal stats tracker to record the number of visits
_shopify_uniq, no data held, expires midnight (relative to the visitor) of the next day, Counts the number of visits to a store by a single customer.
cart, unique token, persistent for 2 weeks, Stores information about the contents of your cart.
_secure_session_id, unique token, sessional
storefront_digest, unique token, indefinite If the shop has a password, this is used to determine if the current visitor has access.
Additionally, when you make a purchase or attempt to make a purchase through the Site, we collect certain information from you, including your name, billing address, shipping address, payment information, email address, and phone number.  We refer to this information as “Order Information.” We do not process or collect card numbers. Cards are processed by Paypal and Shopify by their secured servers.
When we talk about “Personal Information” in this Privacy Policy, we are talking both about Device Information and Order Information.
PAYMENT:
If you choose a direct payment gateway to complete your purchase, then Shopify stores your credit card data. It is encrypted through the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI-DSS). Your purchase transaction data is stored only as long as is necessary to complete your purchase transaction. After that is complete, your purchase transaction information is deleted.
All direct payment gateways adhere to the standards set by PCI-DSS as managed by the PCI Security Standards Council, which is a joint effort of brands like Visa, MasterCard, American Express and Discover.
PCI-DSS requirements help ensure the secure handling of credit card information by our store and its service providers.
For more insight, you may also want to read Shopify’s Terms of Service
HERE
or Shopify Privacy Statement
HERE
.
In general, the third-party providers used by us will only collect, use and disclose your information to the extent necessary to allow them to perform the services they provide to us.
However, certain third-party service providers, such as payment gateways and other payment transaction processors, have their own privacy policies in respect to the information we are required to provide to them for your purchase-related transactions.
For these providers, we recommend that you read their privacy policies so you can understand the manner in which your personal information will be handled by these providers.
In particular, remember that certain providers may be located in or have facilities that are located in a different jurisdiction than either you or us. So if you elect to proceed with a transaction that involves the services of a third-party service provider, then your information may become subject to the laws of the jurisdiction(s) in which that service provider or its facilities are located.
As an example, if you are located in Canada and your transaction is processed by a payment gateway located in the United States, then your personal information used in completing that transaction may be subject to disclosure under United States legislation, including the Patriot Act.
Once you leave our store’s website or are redirected to a third-party website or application, you are no longer governed by this Privacy Policy or our website’s Terms of Service.
“In order to offer you Klarna’s payment methods, we might in the checkout pass your personal data in the form of contact and order details to Klarna, in order for Klarna to assess whether you qualify for their payment methods and to tailor those payment methods for you. Your personal data transferred is processed in line with
Klarna’s own privacy notice
.”
HOW DO WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
We use the Order Information that we collect generally to fulfill any orders placed through the Site (including, arranging for shipping, and providing you with invoices and/or order confirmations).  Additionally, we use this Order Information to:
Communicate with you;
Screen our orders for potential risk or fraud; and
When in line with the preferences you have shared with us, provide you with information or advertising relating to our products or services. Including sending you early notice of our latest discounts and offers.
We use the Device Information that we collect to help us screen for potential risk and fraud (in particular, your IP address), and more generally to improve and optimize our Site (for example, by generating analytics about how our customers browse and interact with the Site, and to assess the success of our marketing and advertising campaigns).
This includes Facebook and other Social media ads and retargeting Facebook and Social media ads.
Email marketing (if applicable): With your permission, we may send you emails about discounts, early notice of our Sales, our store, new products and other updates. All of our emails include an unsubscribe button which you can use at anytime to opt out of any further emails from us.
SHARING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We share your Personal Information with third parties to help us use your Personal Information, as described above.  For example, we use Shopify to power our online store--you can read more about how Shopify uses your Personal Information
HERE
We also use Google Analytics to help us understand how our customers use the Site--you can read more about how Google uses your Personal Information
HERE
.  You can also opt-out of Google Analytics
HERE
.
Finally, we may also share your Personal Information to comply with applicable laws and regulations, to respond to a subpoena, search warrant or other lawful request for information we receive, or to otherwise protect our rights. We may disclose your personal information if we are required by law to do so or if you violate our Terms of Service.
BEHAVIOURAL ADVERTISING
As described above, we use your Personal Information to provide you with targeted advertisements or marketing communications we believe may be of interest to you.  For more information about how targeted advertising works, you can visit the Network Advertising Initiative’s (“NAI”) educational page
HERE
You can opt out of targeted advertising by visiting:
FACEBOOK -
CLICK HERE
GOOGLE -
CLICK HERE
Additionally, you can opt out of some of these services by visiting the Digital Advertising Alliance’s opt-out portal
HERE
.
DO NOT TRACK
Please note that we do not alter our Site’s data collection and use practices when we see a Do Not Track signal from your browser.
LINKS
When you click on links on our store, they may direct you away from our site. We are not responsible for the privacy practices of other sites and encourage you to read their privacy statements.
YOUR RIGHTS
If you are a European resident, you have the right to access personal information we hold about you and to ask that your personal information be corrected, updated, or deleted. If you would like to exercise this right, please contact us through the contact information below.
Additionally, if you are a European resident we note that we are processing your information in order to fulfill contracts we might have with you (for example if you make an order through the Site), or otherwise to pursue our legitimate business interests listed above.  Additionally, please note that your information will be transferred outside of Europe, including to Canada and the United States.
DATA RETENTION
When you place an order through the Site, we will maintain your Order Information for our records unless and until you ask us to delete this information. We can only delete information that is not required to be kept by the laws of Ireland.
Please note that, while
www.virgo-boutique.com
makes all possible efforts to protect our customers’ privacy, we would like to make customers aware that information disclosed while connected to the Internet may be transferred to the
www.virgo-boutique.com
servers over a publicly available telecommunications network.
www.virgo-boutique.com
cannot be held responsible, and accepts no liability, for unauthorised access to the public network beyond its control. All information provided by customers is done entirely at the customers’ own risk.
Privacy Statements of the Companies we work with
Facebook      -
PRIVACY STATEMENT HERE
Klayvio          -
PRIVACY STATEMENT HERE
Shopify          -
PRIVACY STATEMENT HERE
Paypal           -
PRIVACY STATEMENT HERE
Shopify Payments -
PRIVACY STATEMENT HERE
Instagram
DATA POLICY HERE
CHANGES
We may update this privacy policy from time to time to reflect, for example, changes to our practices or for other operational, legal or regulatory reasons.
CONTACT US
For more information about our privacy practices, or if you have further questions, would like to make a complaint, please contact our Privacy Compliance Officer by email to support@lovevirgo.com or by mail at Virgo Boutique, Maiden Street, Newcastle West, Limerick, Eire, Ireland
FREQUENTLY ASKED QUESTIONS
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.klarna.com/international/privacy-policy/:
Discover Klarna
For Business
Privacy policy
Select your country of residence from the list below to read the appropriate policy.
Klarna
Australia
Austria
Belgium (
fr
/
nl
)
Canada (
en
/
fr
)
Czech Republic
Denmark
Finland (
fi
/
se
)
France
Germany
Greece
Hungary
Ireland
Italy
Mexico
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Poland
Portugal
Romania
Slovakia
Spain
Sweden
Switzerland (
de
/
fr
/
it
/
en
)
United Kingdom
United States (
en
/
es
)
Luxembourg
Bulgaria
Slovenia
PriceRunner
Denmark
Sweden
United Kingdom
Sub-policy 1
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation:
Facebook
Email or phone
Password
Forgot account?
Create new account
It looks like you were misusing this feature by going too fast. You’ve been temporarily blocked from using it.
Back
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 2
https://www.klaviyo.com/privacy:
___
Home
/
Legal
/
Privacy
/
Privacy notice
Klaviyo Privacy Notice
Updated December 31, 2024
Thank you for your interest in Klaviyo! This Privacy Notice explains how information about you, that directly identifies you, or that makes you identifiable (“
personal information
”) is collected, used, disclosed, and otherwise processed by Klaviyo in connection with our services.
When we use the terms “
Klaviyo
”, “
Klaviyo Group
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, or “
our
” in this Privacy Notice, we are referring to Klaviyo, Inc. and its affiliates. When we use the term “
Service
” or
“Services,”
we are referring to all of the services and product offerings that we offer as a controller, our website
https://www.klaviyo.com/
or any other Klaviyo Group product or service that posts or links to this Privacy Notice.
Klaviyo as a Data Controller
: For purposes of data protection laws, Klaviyo is the “data controller” (or similar term under applicable laws) and is generally responsible for and controls the processing of your personal information collected through your use of our Service. This Privacy Notice applies only to instances where Klaviyo acts as a data controller.
Klaviyo as a Data Processor
:
In providing our Service, our customers may collect data in our products and services, or we may collect data on their behalf, which may include personal information or data about our customers’ end users (“
Customer Data
”). In such instances, Klaviyo acts as a “data processor” (or similar term under applicable laws), and we have contractually committed ourselves to process Customer Data on behalf and under the instruction of the respective customer, who is the data controller. This Privacy Notice does not apply to the processing of Customer Data and we recommend you read the privacy notice of the respective customer if their processing concerns your personal information.
Table of Contents
How We Collect Your Personal Information
How We Use Your Personal Information
How We Share Personal Information
Online Advertising
Control Over Your Information
Privacy Rights
Children
Third Party Websites and Services
Changes to Privacy Notice
Contact Us
Region-Specific Disclosures
Additional Disclosures for Australia Residents
Additional Disclosures for California Residents (United States)
Additional Disclosures for Nevada Residents (United States)
Additional Disclosures for the European Economic Area, United Kingdom, and Switzerland
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles
EU, Swiss, and UK Representative
Back to top ⬆︎
1. HOW WE COLLECT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
When you interact with us, we are collecting personal information about you. Sometimes we collect personal information automatically when you interact with our Services and sometimes we collect the personal information directly from you. At times, we may collect personal information about you from third parties.
Personal Information You Provide
We may collect the following personal information you provide in connection with our Service:
Account Creation and Profile Information for a Klaviyo Account
. We may collect personal information that you provide when you register for an account (where available). This information includes your email and password, company name, company URL, office phone number and office address. You may also add or confirm your name, company industry, tax ID, billing address, time zone and source of contact/lead.
Contract Data
. If your company enters into a contractual relationship with us, we may collect your name, job title, email address, signature (if wet signed or a copy of their autograph is used), customer name and address, and information about how you heard about us.
Payment and Transaction Information
. If you sign up for one of our Services requiring payment, we collect the information provided in connection with such payment. Please note that we use third party payment processors to process payments made to us. As such, all such information is provided directly by you to our third-party processor. The payment processor’s use of your personal information is governed by their privacy notice. We will only receive the last 4 digits of the credit card number along with transaction-related information (i.e., payment date, amount, device type, IP address and card type). If custom billing is arranged, the account contact’s name, email, job title, company and address may be collected as well.
Communications
. When you contact us through any method of communications, including through one of our website “Contact Us”, “Chat” or “Support” functions or you request a demo of the Klaviyo platform, we may collect your name, email address, mailing address, phone number, company/company URL, account ID, type of inquiry, or any other personal information you choose to provide to us, such as how many contacts you have/your company has, which products interest you, what platform is currently being used, and meeting dates and times.
Newsletter, Marketing Emails, and Blog
.
If you sign up to receive news or alerts from us, or subscribe to our blog, we may collect your email and applicable interests and communication preferences.
Klaviyo Academy
. If you sign up for training sessions via the Klaviyo Academy, we ask for your user’s name, email, and password. You may add a profile picture. When using the platform, a user’s history on registrations, courses taken, scores, and product certifications, survey responses and lead status as well as unique identifier are captured.
Klaviyo Community
. If you wish to participate in the Klaviyo network with other account holders and find resources, insights and further support from other used, you may participate in the Klaviyo Community. In this case we may collect the following data: your account credentials, your Klaviyo account ID, email address and partner ID. Your account will also show classifications based on your involvement in the Community and badges based on your involvement/accomplishment (both of which can be managed in the profile settings to be visible or not visible to other users of the Community) as well as all content you share via the Community function. Moreover, you may add your name, username, job title, city, country, profile picture, social media (Instagram and Twitter), and bio/signature details that may be visible to the other users of the Community.
Klaviyo Partner
. If you apply to be a Klaviyo partner, we may collect personal information that you provide when you sign up (where available). This information includes your name, email, title, business phone number, company name, company URL and office address.
Events, Surveys, Feedback and Promotions (including Contests, Sweepstakes, Webinars, and Training Sessions)
. If you fill out any forms or otherwise provide your information to us in connection with Klaviyo events, surveys, or other promotional events (including contests, sweepstakes, webinars, and trainings), as well as when you provide feedback to us, we may collect your contact information (such as your name, email, and phone number), your organization company, your job title, the office address and any other information you provide to us.
Personal Information Automatically Collected
As is true of most digital platforms, we and our third-party providers and partners collect certain personal information automatically when you visit, interact with, or use our Service and emails. Such information is collected through the use of cookies and similar technologies such as pixels and Local Storage Objects (LSOs) like HTML5 (together “
cookies
”). This helps us to provide you with a good experience when you use our Services and also allows us to monitor and analyze how you use and interact with our Services so that we can continue to improve our Services. It also helps us and our partners to determine products and services that may be of interest to you.
Specifically, we may collect the following information:
Log Data
:  Including your internet protocol (IP) address, operating system, browser details such as type, ID, and configuration, unique identifiers, local and language settings; session logging, heatmaps and scrolls; screen resolution, ISP, device type and version, the referring URL, date/time of your visit, the time you spent on our services and any errors that may occur during your visit to our Services.
Analytics Data
:  Including the electronic path you take to our services, through our services and when exiting our services, UTM source, as well as your usage and activity on our services, such as the time zone, activity information (first and last active date and time), usage history (flows created, campaigns scheduled, emails opened, total log-ins) as well as the pages, links, objects, products and benefits you view, click or otherwise interact with. We may also analyze the interaction between you and your customer using our Services.
Digital Behavioral Data
: Web page interactions (clicks, hovers, focus, mouse movements, browsing, zooms and other interactions), referring web page/source through which you accessed the Sites, and statistics associated with the interaction between device or browser and the Sites.
Location Data
:  Including your general geographic location based on the IP address we collect.
Platform Data
: If you have an account to use the services we offer as a processor, we may in addition also collect your name, phone number, email address, company information, status in the sales cycle, lead and commercial details (like platform specifics, initial marketing channel), and user and account ID and other identifiers (such as Salesforce ID and Klaviyo ID), NPS/account sentiments, Klaviyo Academy user profile/history data, account health status, event attendance, status as lead/account, integrations.
For more information about these practices and your choices regarding cookies, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Personal Information from Other Sources and Third Parties
We may also obtain personal information from third parties, which we may combine with personal information we collect either automatically or directly from an individual.
We may receive personal information from the following third parties:
Klaviyo Entities
: We may receive personal information from other companies and brands owned or controlled by Klaviyo Group, and other companies owned by or under common ownership as Klaviyo Group.
Klaviyo
Business and Marketing Partners
. We may also disclose personal information with other business and marketing partners with whom we jointly offer products or services, co-market or host events, or who are part of our partner ecosystem. The information we disclose may include your name, phone number, email address, company name and address, opportunity/interest details of your company, and information on whether your company is a current client of our partner.
Social
Media
: When an individual interacts with us through various social media networks, such as when someone “Likes” us on Facebook or follows us or shares our content on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram or other social networks through, for example, the social media buttons embedded into our website, we may receive some information about individuals that they permit the social network to share with third parties. The data we receive is dependent upon an individual’s privacy settings with the social network. Individuals should always review and, if necessary, adjust their privacy settings on third-party websites and social media networks and services before sharing information and/or linking or connecting them to other services.
Service
Providers
: Our service providers that perform services solely on our behalf, such as chat services, payout processing, and marketing providers, collect personal information and often share some or all of this information with us.
Back to top ⬆︎
2.  HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We may use the personal information we collect for the following purposes:
Fulfill our contractual obligations, to deliver the Services you have requested, including facilitating your messages to other users or groups and for account and contract management (including customer support);
Communicate with individuals, including via email, text message, social media and/or telephone and video calls;
Review our business performance;
Market and sell our Services to individuals, including through email, direct mail, phone, video call,  text message, or through other forms of communications platforms (i.e., WhatsApp);
Send gifts to you;
Administer, improve and personalize our Services, including by recognizing an individual and remembering their information when they return to our Services and analyzing our client-base;
Process payment for our Services;
Conduct market research;
Opportunity tracking, conversion and lead generation;
Test, enhance, update and monitor the Services, or diagnose or fix technology problems;
Help maintain the safety, security and integrity of our property and Services, technology assets and business;
Enforce our
Terms of Service
, resolve disputes, carry out our obligations and enforce our rights, and protect our business interests and the interests and rights of third parties;
Prevent, investigate or provide notice of fraud or unlawful or criminal activity;
Process and deliver contest and sweepstakes entry and awards; and
Comply with legal obligations.
Back to top ⬆︎
3. HOW WE SHARE PERSONAL INFORMATION
We may also share, transmit, disclose, grant access to, make available, and provide personal information with and to third parties, as described below.
Service Providers
:
We share personal information with third party contractors and service providers, that are subject to reasonable confidentiality terms, and which may include processing payments, providing web hosting and maintenance services, technology support providers, email and messaging communications providers, analytics providers, data storage providers, and web and video hosting providers and developers. Any such service providers will be subject to confidentiality provisions, and be bound to only process the data on our behalf and under our instructions, unless such service providers act as their own controllers (e.g., in the case we seek advice from lawyers and tax consultants).
Klaviyo Group
:
We may share with other companies and brands owned or controlled by Klaviyo Group, and other companies owned by or under common ownership as Klaviyo Group. These companies will use your personal information in the same way as we can under this Privacy Notice.
Business and Marketing Partners
: We may also disclose personal information with other business and marketing partners with whom we jointly offer products or services, co-market or host events, or who are part of our partner ecosystem. We may obtain your consent where required by applicable law. Our business and marketing partners will use your information in accordance with their own privacy notices.
Advertising Partners
: We may share certain personal information (including information collected through cookies) with our advertising service providers and vendors in order to advertise our Services to you. For more information on how we collect and share this information, please see the
Online Advertising
section of this Privacy Notice.
Corporate Transaction
:
We may transfer any information we collect in the event we sell or transfer all or a portion of our business or assets (including any shares in the company) or any portion or combination of our products, services, businesses and/or assets. Should such a transaction occur (whether a divestiture, merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, dissolution, reorganization, liquidation, change of control or similar transaction or proceeding), we will use reasonable efforts to ensure that any transferred information is treated in a manner consistent with this Privacy Notice.
Legal Obligations and Rights
:
We may disclose personal information to third parties, such as legal advisors and law enforcement agencies, regulators, other authorities and other third parties for legal reasons if we reasonably believe that such action is necessary:
in connection with the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims;
to comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process;
to protect our rights and property and the rights, personal safety and property of others, including to enforce our agreements and policies;
to detect, suppress, or prevent fraud; or
as otherwise required by applicable law.
The Public/Other Klaviyo Community users, when you post content on the Klaviyo Community portion of the website
:
Remember, our websites allow you to connect and interact with others. In that case, your personal data may be visible to others as set out above under “Klaviyo Community”.
With Your Consent
: We may disclose personal information about an individual to certain other third parties or publicly with their consent or direction. For example, with an individual’s consent or direction we may post their testimonial on our website or service-related publications.
Back to top ⬆︎
4. ONLINE ADVERTISING
We may share (or we may permit these parties to collect) personal information with online advertising networks, social media companies, and other third-party services, including information about your use of our Service over time, so that they may play or display ads that may be relevant to your interests on other websites or apps, or on other devices you may use.  Typically, though not always, the information we share is provided through cookies or similar tracking technologies, which recognize the device you are using and collect information, including hashed data, clickstream information, browser type, time and date you visited the website and other information.  This information is used to display targeted ads on other websites, apps, or services. We or the online advertising networks use this information to make the advertisements you see online more relevant to your interests. We may also display targeted advertising to you through social media platforms, such as LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter, Google, and others. These companies have interest-based advertising programs that allow us to direct advertisements to users who have shown interest in our services while those users are on the social media platform, or to groups of other users who share similar traits, such as likely commercial interests and demographics. These advertisements are governed by the privacy policies of those social media companies that provide them. For more information on our online practices specifically in relation to cookies, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Back to top ⬆︎
5. CONTROL OVER YOUR INFORMATION
Email Communications
. From time to time, we may send you emails regarding updates to our Services, products or services, notices about our organization, or information about products/services we offer that we think may be of interest to you. If you wish to unsubscribe from such emails, simply click the “unsubscribe link” provided at the bottom of the email communication. Note that you cannot unsubscribe from certain services-related communications (e.g., account verification, confirmations of transactions, technical or legal notices).
Messaging Platforms
. We may use personal information we collect to communicate with you via messaging platforms (such as WhatsApp), including to market to you or offer you information and updates on products or services we think you may be interested in. We may obtain your consent where required by applicable law. You can unsubscribe from these messages at any time by replying STOP in one of our messages.
SMS Text Messaging
. We may use personal information we collect to communicate with you via text message, including (with your consent) to market to you or offer you information and updates on products or services we think you may be interested in. You can unsubscribe from marketing text messages at any time by replying STOP or clicking the unsubscribe link (where available) in one of our messages. For more information, please see our
Terms of Service
.
Modifying Account Information
. If you have a Klaviyo service account with us, you have the ability to modify certain information in your account (e.g., your contact information and profile picture) through the “Contact Information” tab in the “Account” section in your Klaviyo account. Not all personal information is maintained in a format that you can access or change. If you would like to request access to, or correction or deletion of personal information, you may send your request to us by messaging support in the support portal through your Klaviyo account. We will review your request and may require you to provide additional information to identify yourself, but we do not promise that we will be able to satisfy your request.
Back to top ⬆︎
6. PRIVACY RIGHTS
In accordance with applicable privacy law and the jurisdiction in which you reside, you may be able to exercise some or all of the following rights in relation to the personal information about you that we have collected (subject to certain limitations at law):
Right of access and portability
. You may have the right to obtain access to the personal information we have collected about you and, where required by law, the right to obtain a copy of the personal information.
Right to correction
. You may have the right to require us to correct inaccuracies in your personal information, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of the personal information.
Right to deletion
. You may have the right to request the deletion of your personal information, subject to certain exceptions.
Right to opt-out
. You may have the right to opt-out of certain processing activities. For example, you may have the right to opt-out of the use of your personal information for targeted advertising purposes, or the “sale” of your personal information to third parties in certain contexts. You may also have the right to direct us not to use automated decision-making or profiling for certain purposes. Please note that depending on the nature and scope of your request, we may not be in a position to continue providing our services to you.
Right to exercise control over sensitive personal information
.
You may have the right to exercise control over our collection and processing of certain sensitive personal information.
Right to non-retaliation
. You may have the right to be free from retaliatory or discriminatory treatment for exercising any of the rights described above.
To exercise your rights
:
please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request
.
Before processing your request, we will need to verify your identity and confirm you are a resident of a jurisdiction that offers such right(s). In order to verify your identity, we will generally either require the successful authentication of your account, or the matching of sufficient information you provide us to the information we maintain about you in our systems. This process may require us to request additional personal information from you. In certain circumstances, we may decline a request to exercise the rights described above, particularly where we are unable to verify your identity or locate your information in our systems. If we are unable to comply with all or a portion of your request, we will explain the reasons for declining to comply with the request. Please note that notwithstanding any exercise of your rights described above by you, we may continue to collect, use, disclose or process your personal information where we are permitted or required to do so by law or requested or ordered to be do so by relevant authorities or law enforcement agencies.
To exercise your right to opt-out
: please submit a request, as follows:
Opt-out of targeted advertising (cookies opt-out), please use our cookie management tool:
Cookie Management Tool
Opt-out of data “sales”, please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request
.
Unless you have exercised your right to opt-out, we may disclose or “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or use your information for all the purposes described in this Privacy Notice, including for targeted advertising. The third parties to whom we sell or disclose personal information may use such information for their own purposes in accordance with their own privacy statements.
You do not need to create an account with us to exercise your right to opt-out. However, we may ask you to provide additional personal information so that we can properly identify you to track compliance with your opt-out request. We will only use personal information provided in an opt-out request to review and comply with the request. If you choose not to provide this information, we may only be able to process your request to the extent we are able to identify you in our data systems. We may not process your request if we, in good faith, believe that the request is fraudulent. In such instances, we will send a notice to the requestor explaining our decision.
Back to top ⬆︎
7. CHILDREN
Our Services are not directed to, and we do not intend to, or knowingly, collect or solicit personal information from children under the age of 16. If an individual is under the age of 16, they should not use our Services or otherwise provide us with any personal information either directly or by other means. If a child under the age of 16 has provided personal information to us, we encourage the child’s parent or guardian to contact us to request that we remove the personal information from our systems. If we learn that any personal information we collect has been provided by a child under the age of 16, we will promptly delete that personal information.
Back to top ⬆︎
8. THIRD PARTY WEBSITES AND SERVICES
The Services may contain integrations or links to third party websites or services, including those of our business partners. By interacting with these third parties, you are providing information directly to the third party and not Klaviyo. Please note that Klaviyo is not responsible for the privacy practices of these third parties or any entity that it does not own or control. We encourage you to review the privacy notices and online terms of those third parties to learn more about how they handle your personal information.
Back to top ⬆︎
9. CHANGES TO PRIVACY NOTICE
We reserve the right to change this Privacy Notice from time to time in our sole discretion. We will notify you about material changes in the way we treat personal information by adequately informing you via your account, by placing a prominent notice on our website, or through other appropriate communication channels. It is your responsibility to review this Privacy Notice periodically. All changes shall be effective from the date of publication unless otherwise provided.
Back to top ⬆︎
10. CONTACT US
If you have any questions or requests in connection with this Privacy Notice or other privacy-related matters, please send an email to
privacy@klaviyo.com
.
Back to top ⬆︎
11. REGION-SPECIFIC DISCLOSURES
This Privacy Notice is designed to apply to our website visitors, users of our Service, and other companies and users on a global basis. Please refer below for additional disclosures that may be applicable to you:
Back to top ⬆︎
ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES FOR AUSTRALIA RESIDENTS
These additional disclosures for Australian residents (“
Australian Disclosures
”) supplement the information contained in our
Privacy Notice
and applies solely to individuals in Australia (“
you
”).
These Australian Disclosures provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and otherwise process personal information of individuals in Australia, either online or offline, within the Australian
Privacy Act 1988
(Cth) and the Australian Privacy Principles (“
APPs
”) found in Schedule 1 of the
Privacy Act
.
Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these Australian Disclosures have the same meaning as defined in our
Privacy Notice
or as otherwise defined in the
Privacy Act
.
When we use the term “
personal information
” in this Australian Disclosures notice, we mean information or an opinion about an identified individual or an individual who is reasonably identifiable, whether the information or opinion:
is true or not; and
is recorded in a material form or not.
A. HOW WE COLLECT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
The various ways in which your personal information is collected are described in Section 1 of our Privacy Notice, We may also collect your personal information if we record any phone calls or video calls (with your permission) between you and Klaviyo.
B. OVERSEAS TRANSFERS OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Your personal information may be transferred to and stored in locations outside Australia where we and our third-party service providers have operations, including in the United States, where Klaviyo, Inc. is located and the United Kingdom.
In the event of a transfer by Klaviyo to a location outside Australia, we ensure that: (i) personal information is transferred to countries recognized as having an equivalent level of privacy protection to Australia; or (ii) the transfer is made pursuant to appropriate safeguards, such as contractual obligations.
C. STORING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect your personal information against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal information we collect will be stored by our cloud hosting provider on secure servers.
We will never send you unsolicited emails or contact you by phone requesting credit or debit card information.
D. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
You have various rights under the APPs.
Right to access and request
You have the right to request access to and/or the correction of your personal information held by Klaviyo. You can exercise these rights by contacting our Privacy Officer at
privacy@klaviyo.com
.
We will respond to your request within a reasonable time. If your request is refused, you will be provided with written reasons for the refusal and information about the mechanisms you can use to complain about the refusal.
Right to complain
You also have a right to make a privacy complaint to our Privacy Officer at
privacy@klaviyo.com
.
Our Privacy Officer will first consider your complaint to determine whether there are simple or immediate steps which can be taken to resolve the complaint. Our Privacy Officer will endeavor to complete the investigation into your complaint promptly. You may be asked to provide further information about your complaint and the outcome you are seeking. Our Privacy Officer will then typically gather relevant facts, locate, and review relevant documents, and speak with individuals involved.
In most cases, our Privacy Officer will investigate and provide a written response to your complaint within 30 days of receipt of the complaint. If the matter is more complex or the investigation may take longer, our Privacy Officer will let you know.
If you are not satisfied with Klaviyo’s response to your complaint, a complaint may be made to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (“
OAIC
”). The OAIC can be contacted by telephone on 1300 363 992 or by using the contact details on the website
www.oaic.gov.au
.
Back to top ⬆︎
ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS (UNITED STATES)
These additional disclosures for California residents (“
CA Disclosures
”) supplement the information contained in our
Privacy Notice
and apply solely to individual residents of the State of California (“
consumers
” or “
you
”).
These CA Disclosures provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and otherwise process personal information of individual residents of the State of California, either online or offline, within the scope of the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (collectively, the “
CCPA
”)
Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these CA Disclosures have the same meaning as defined in our
Privacy Notice
or as otherwise defined in the CCPA.
When we use the term “
personal information
” in this CA Notice, we mean information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household.
A. COLLECTION AND USE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
We collect personal information from and about you for a variety of purposes, as described in the
How We Collect Your Personal Information
and
How We Use Your Personal Information
sections of the
Privacy Notice
.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
. In the last 12 months, we have collected the following categories of personal information:
Identifiers
, such as your first, middle and last name, email address, username, or other similar identifiers;
CA Customer Categories
, such as your name, phone number, and postal address;
Commercial Information
, such as records of services purchased, obtained or considered;
Internet/Network Information
, such as device information, logs and analytics data;
Geolocation Data
, such as approximate location data generated based on your IP address or other information;
Sensory Information
, such as recordings of any phone calls or video calls (with your permission, as applicable) between you and Klaviyo;
Professional/Employment Information
, such as the business or organization you represent, your title with that business or organization and information relating to your role with the business or organization, job application information and other details contained in your resume;
Inferences
about your interests and preferences, generated from your use of our sites; and
Other Personal Information
, including information you submit into the feedback form and any communications between you and Klaviyo, as well as information we receive from social networking sites.
We collect this information from the following sources: directly from you, from our business partners and affiliates, from your browser or device when you visit our App or use our Services, or from third parties that you permit to share information with us. Please see the
How We Collect Your Personal Information
section of the Privacy Notice for more information about the sources of personal information we collect.
B. DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
We share personal information with third parties for business purposes. The categories of third parties to whom we disclose your personal information for a business purpose include: (i) other brands and affiliates in our family of companies; (ii) our service providers and advisors; (iii) analytics providers; (iv) marketing and strategic partners; and (v) social networks.
In the previous 12 months, we have disclosed all of the categories of personal information we collect, explained in the
Collection and Use of Personal Information
section of these CA Disclosures, to third parties for a business purpose, as describe the
How We Share Your Personal Information
section of the Privacy Notice.
C. SALE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
As further described in the
How We Share Your Personal Information
section of the Privacy Notice, we may “sell” or “share” your personal information (as those terms are defined by the CCPA) to third parties, subject to your right to opt out of those sales or sharing (see
Exercise Your Right to Opt-Out
below).
In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of personal information for the purposes described in our Privacy Notice, subject to your settings and preferences and your Right to Opt-Out: Identifiers, such as your name and email address, CA Customer Categories, such as your name and phone number, and Commercial Information, such as records of services purchased, obtained or considered.
The categories of third parties to whom we may sell or share the personal information include:
Business and Marketing Partners
Online Advertising Networks and Analytics Providers
Social Networks
We may also disclose personal information to third parties at your direction or upon your request, in connection with a corporate business transaction, or to comply with legal or contractual obligations, as described in our Privacy Notice.
D. YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
As a California resident, you may be able to exercise the following rights in relation to the personal information that we have collected about you (subject to certain limitations at law):
The Right to Access/Know
You have the right to request any or all of the following information relating to your personal information we have collected and disclosed in the last 12 months, upon verification of your identity:
• The specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you;
• The categories of personal information we have collected about you;
• The categories of sources of the personal information;
• The categories of personal information that we have disclosed to third parties for a business purpose, and the categories of recipients to whom this information was disclosed;
• The categories of personal information we have sold about you (if any), and the categories of third parties to whom the information was sold; and
• The business or commercial purposes for collecting or, if applicable, selling the personal information.
The Right to Request Deletion
You have the right to request the deletion of personal information we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
The Right to Correction
You have the right to request that any inaccuracies in your personal information be corrected, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of your personal information.
The Right to Opt-Out of Sales or Sharing of Personal Information
You have the right to direct us not to “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or “share” your personal information to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
If you are under the age of 16, you have the right to opt in, or to have a parent or guardian opt in on your behalf, to such sales.
The Right to Limit Use and Disclosure of Personal Information
You have the right to direct us to limit the use of your sensitive personal information to certain purposes, subject to certain exceptions.
The Right to Control Over Automated Decision-Making / Profiling
You have the right to direct us not to use automated decision-making or profiling for certain purposes.
The Right to Non-Retaliation
You have the right not to receive retaliatory or discriminatory treatment for exercising these rights.
However, please note that if the exercise of these rights limits our ability to process personal information (such as in the case of a deletion request), we may no longer be able to provide you our products and services or engage with you in the same manner.
“Shine the Light”
California residents that have an established business relationship with us have rights to know how their information is disclosed to third parties for their direct marketing purposes under California’s “Shine the Light” law, or the right to opt out of such practices (Civ. Code §1798.83).
E. HOW TO EXERCISE YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
Exercise Your Right to Access, Right to Know, Right to Correction, and Right to Deletion
To exercise your
Right to Access, Right to Know, Right to Correction, or your Right to Deletion
: please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request
.
Before processing your request, we will need to verify your identity and confirm you are a resident of the State of California. In order to verify your identity, we will generally either require the successful authentication of your account, or the matching of sufficient information you provide us to the information we maintain about you in our systems. This process may require us to request additional personal information from you, including, but not limited to, your email address, phone number, and/or date of last transaction on our Services.
In certain circumstances, we may decline a request to exercise the rights described above, particularly where we are unable to verify your identity or locate your information in our systems. If we are unable to comply with all or a portion of your request, we will explain the reasons for declining to comply with the request.
Exercise Your Right to Opt-Out of Personal Information Sales or Sharing for Targeted Advertising
Unless you have exercised your
Right to Opt-Out
, we may disclose or “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or “share” your personal information to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes. The third parties to whom we sell or share personal information may use such information for their own purposes in accordance with their own privacy policies.
You do not need to create an account with us to exercise your Right to Opt-Out. However, we may ask you to provide additional personal information so that we can properly identify you to track compliance with your opt-out request. We will only use personal information provided in an opt-out request to review and comply with the request. If you choose not to provide this information, we may only be able to process your request to the extent we are able to identify you in our data systems.
To exercise the Right to Opt-Out of personal information “sales,” you may submit a request by clicking the link below:
DO NOT SELL MY PERSONAL INFORMATION
Additionally, as is common practice among companies that operate online, we permit third party advertising networks, social media companies and other third party businesses to collect and disclose your personal information (including preferences, geolocation, commercial information and internet, network and device information) directly from your browser or device through cookies or tracking technologies when you visit or interact with our websites, use our apps or otherwise engage with us. These third parties use this information for the purposes of serving ads that are more relevant, for ad campaign measurement and analytics, and for fraud detection and reporting and may sell or share that information to other businesses for advertising and other purposes. To learn more about how third parties collect information through tracking technologies and what other choices you may have in relation to those activities, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
To exercise the Right to Opt-Out of the sharing of your personal information for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes (targeted advertising), you may submit a request by clicking on the following link to be added to our suppression list:
Cookie Settings
Authorized Agents
In certain circumstances, you may permit an authorized agent to submit requests to exercise your California Privacy Rights on your behalf. The authorized agent must provide a letter signed by you confirming the agent has permission to submit a request on your behalf or must provide sufficient evidence to show that the authorized agent has been lawfully vested with power of attorney.
For security purposes, we may need to verify your identity and confirm directly with you that you have provided the authorized agent permission to submit the request, and it may take additional time to fulfil agent-submitted requests. We may deny a request in the event we are not able to verify the authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf. Please note that for privacy and security reasons, we will direct future communications to the data subject on whose behalf the request was made.
“Shine the Light” Disclosures
The California “Shine the Light” law gives residents of California the right under certain circumstances to request information from us regarding the manner in which we share certain categories of personal information (as defined in the Shine the Light law) with third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To opt out of this type of sharing, please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request
.
Notice of Financial Incentives
In addition, we may offer you financial incentives for the collection, sale, retention, and use of your personal information as permitted by the CCPA that can, without limitation, result in reasonably different prices, rates, or quality levels. The material aspects of any financial incentive will be explained and described in its program terms. Please note that participating in incentive programs is entirely optional, you will have to affirmatively opt-in to the program and you can opt-out of each program (i.e., terminate participation and forgo the ongoing incentives) prospectively by following the instructions in the applicable program description and terms. We may add or change incentive programs, and/or their terms by posting notice on the program descriptions and terms linked to above, so check them regularly.
Each financial incentive or price or service difference related to the collection and use of personal information is based upon our reasonable, good-faith determination of the estimated value of such information to our business, taking into consideration the value of the offer itself and the anticipated revenue generation that may be realized by rewarding brand loyalty. We calculate the value of the offer and financial incentive by using the expense related to the offer.
Minors
We do not sell the personal information and do not have actual knowledge that we sell the personal information of minors under 16 years of age. Please contact us at
privacy@klaviyo.com
to inform us if you, or your minor child, are under the age of 16.
If you are under the age of 18 and you want to remove your name or comments from our website or publicly displayed content, please contact us directly at
privacy@klaviyo.com
. We may not be able to modify or delete your information in all circumstances.
Back to top ⬆︎
ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES FOR NEVADA RESIDENTS (UNITED STATES)
If you are a resident of the State of Nevada in the United States, Chapter 603A of the Nevada Revised Statutes permits a Nevada resident to opt out of future sales of certain covered information that a website operator has collected or will collect about the resident. To opt out of this kind of future sales, please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request
.
Back to top ⬆︎
ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES FOR THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA, UNITED KINGDOM, AND SWITZERLAND
Klaviyo Group maintains operations in Europe and may direct our services to individuals located in the EEA, UK and Switzerland. In these instances, the following additional disclosures apply to our processing of personal data.
When we use the term “
personal data
” in this section, we mean information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person.
CONTROLLERS
Klaviyo, Inc. is the controller of your personal data.
In addition, Klaviyo Ltd and Klaviyo Ireland Limited are jointly responsible to process your personal data for the following reasons: perform our contractual services, as further described below.
A. LEGAL BASES FOR THE PROCESSING
We use your personal data based on the following legal grounds according to the Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (the “
EU GDPR
”) or, where applicable, the “
UK GDPR
” as it forms part of the law of England and Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland by virtue of section 3 of the UK European Union (Withdrawal) Act 2018 GDPR:
Category of Data Subject
Personal Data Processed
Purposes of Processing
Legal Basis for Processing
• Customers, where the customer is a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Email and password, company name, company URL, office phone number and office address. You may also add or confirm your name, company industry, tax ID, billing address, time zone and source of contact/lead
Account creation and profile information for a Klaviyo account
• Performance of a contract
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Name, job title, email address, signature (if wet signed or a copy of their autograph is used), customer name and address, and information about how you heard about us.
• If your company enters into a contractual relationship with us
• Deliver the Services you have requested, including facilitating your messages to other users or groups and for account and contract management (including customer support)
• Performance of a contract
• Customers, if a natural person
We will only receive the last 4 digits of the credit card number along with transaction-related information (i.e., payment date, amount, device type, IP address and card type). If custom billing is arranged, the account contact’s name, email, job title, company and address may be collected as well.
Processing payments for the Services
• Performance of a contract
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Name, email address, mailing address, phone number, company/company URL, account ID, type of inquiry, or any other personal information you choose to provide to us, such as how many contacts you have/your company has, which products interest you, what platform is currently being used, and meeting dates and times, applicable marketing interests and communication preferences
• Communications with customers and users of Klaviyo.
• Marketing and Sales of our Services to individuals, including through email, direct mail, phone, video call, text message, or through other forms of communications platforms (i.e. WhatsApp)
• To send gifts to you
• Conduct marketing research
• Opportunity tracking, conversion, and lead generation
• Legitimate interest to communicate with and market to customers
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Your username, email, and password. You may add a profile picture. When using the platform, a user’s history on registrations, courses taken, scores, and product certifications, survey responses and lead status as well as unique identifier are captured.
To facilitate joining and administration of the Klaviyo Academy
• Legitimate interest in providing the Klaviyo Academy to customers and users
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Your account credentials, your Klaviyo account ID, email address and partner ID. Your account will also show classifications based on your involvement in the Community and badges based on your involvement/accomplishment (both of which can be managed in the profile settings to be visible or not visible to other users of the Community) as well as all content you share via the Community function. Moreover, you may add your name, username, job title, city, country, profile picture, social media (Instagram and Twitter), and bio/signature details that may be visible to the other users of the Community.
Klaviyo Community – to facilitate participation in the Klaviyo network with other account holders and as required to administer the Klaviyo Community.
• Legitimate interest in providing the Klaviyo Community to customers and users
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Personal information that you provide when you sign up (where available). This information includes your name, email, title, business phone number, company name, company URL and office address.
• Participation in the Klaviyo Partner program.
• To process your application to become a Klaviyo Partner and to administer the Klaviyo Partner program.
• Legitimate interest in providing the Klaviyo Partner program to customers and users
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Name, email, and phone number), your company, your job title, the office address and any other information you provide to us.
Events, Surveys, Feedback and Promotions (including Contests, Sweepstakes, Webinars, and Training Sessions).
• Legitimate interest in communicating with customers and users and administering promotions to customers and users
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Log Data
: your internet protocol (IP) address, operating system, browser details such as type, ID, and configuration, unique identifiers, local and language settings; session logging, heatmaps and scrolls; screen resolution, ISP, device type and version, the referring URL, date/time of your visit, the time you spent on our services and any errors that may occur during your visit to our Services.
Analytics Data:
the electronic path you take to our services, through our services and when exiting our services, UTM source, as well as your usage and activity on our services, such as the time zone, activity information (first and last active date and time), usage history (flows created, campaigns scheduled, emails opened, total log-ins) as well as the pages, links, objects, products and benefits you view, click or otherwise interact with. We may also analyze the interaction between you and your customer using our Services.
Digital Behavioral Data
: web page interactions (clicks, hovers, focus, mouse movements, browsing, zooms and other interactions), referring web page/source through which you accessed the Sites, and statistics associated with the interaction between device or browser and the Sites.
Location Data
:  your general geographic location based on the IP address we collect.
Platform Data:
If you have an account to use the services we may offer as a processor, we may in addition also collect your name, phone number, email address, company information, status in the sales cycle, lead and commercial details (like platform specifics, internal marketing channel), and user and account ID and other identifies (such as Salesforce ID and Klaviyo ID), NPS/account sentiments, Klaviyo Academy user profile/history data, account health status, event attendance, status as lead/account, and integrations
• Administer, improve and personalize our Services, including by recognizing an individual and remembering their information when they return to our Services and analyzing our Customer base
• Test, enhance, update and monitor the Services, or diagnose or fix technology problems Help maintain the safety, security and integrity of our property and Services, technology assets and business
• Enforce our
Terms of Service
, resolve disputes, carry out our obligations and enforce our rights, and protect our business interests and the interests and rights of third parties
• Prevent, investigate or provide notice of fraud or unlawful or criminal activity
• Review our business performance
• Legitimate interest in enhancing and improving the Klaviyo Services
• Consent
• Performance of a Contract
• Comply with Legal Obligations
B. HOW LONG WILL WE STORE YOUR PERSONAL DATA
We will usually store the personal data we collect about you for no longer than necessary for the purposes as set above, and in accordance with our legal obligations and legitimate business interests.
The criteria used to determine the period for which personal data about you will be retained varies depending on the legal basis under which we process the personal data:
Contract
.
Where we are processing personal data is based on contract, we generally will retain your personal data for the duration of the contract plus some additional limited period of time that is necessary to comply with law or that represents the statute of limitations for legal claims that could arise from our contractual relationship.
Legitimate Interests
.
Where we are processing personal data based on our legitimate interests, we generally will retain such information for a reasonable period of time based on the particular interest, taking into account your fundamental interests and your rights and freedoms.
Consent
.
Where we are processing personal data based on your consent, we generally will retain your personal data until you withdraw your consent, or otherwise for the period of time necessary to fulfil the underlying agreement with you or provide you with the applicable service for which we process that personal data.
Legal Obligation
.
Where we are processing personal data based on a legal obligation, we generally will retain your personal data for the period of time necessary to fulfil the legal obligation.
Legal Claim
. We may need to apply a “legal hold” that retains information beyond our typical retention period where we face threat of legal claim or intent to establish a claim. In that case, we will retain the information until the hold is removed, which typically means the claim or threat of claim has been resolved.
In all cases, in addition to the purposes and legal bases, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the personal data, as well as the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data.
C. MARKETING AND ADVERTISING
From time to time we may contact you with information about our services, including sending you marketing messages and asking for your feedback on our Services. Most marketing messages we send will be by email or via messaging platform. For some marketing messages, we may use personal data we collect about you to help us determine the most relevant marketing information to share with you.
We may send you marketing messages if you have given us your consent to do so or where we have relied on the soft opt-in rule (where applicable).  If you wish to unsubscribe from such communication, please see the details set out above under “Control over Your Information”.
D. STORING AND TRANSFERRING YOUR PERSONAL DATA
Security
. We implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect your personal data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal data we collect will be stored by our cloud hosting provider on secure servers. We will never send you unsolicited emails or contact you by phone requesting credit or debit card information.
International Transfers of your Personal data
. The personal data we collect may be transferred to and stored in countries outside the EEA, UK and Switzerland in countries where we and our third-party service providers have operations, including in the United States, where Klaviyo, Inc. is located.
In the event of a transfer by Klaviyo, we ensure that: (i) the personal data is transferred to countries recognized as offering an equivalent level of protection; or (ii) the transfer is made pursuant to appropriate safeguards, such as standard contractual clauses adopted by the European Commission.
If you wish to enquire further about these safeguards used, please contact us using the details set out under the “
Contact Us
” section of the Privacy Notice.
E. YOUR RIGHTS IN RESPECT OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA
In accordance with applicable privacy law, you may have the following rights in respect of your personal data that we hold:
Right to deletion
. You have the right to request the deletion of personal information we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
Right of access
. You have the right to obtain certain information about our processing of your personal data which includes:
confirmation of whether, and where, we are processing your personal data;
information about the categories of personal data we are processing, the purposes for which we process your personal data and information as to how we determine applicable retention periods;
information about the categories of recipients with whom we may share your personal data; and
a copy of the personal data we hold about you.
Right of portability
. You have the right, in certain circumstances, to receive a copy of the personal data you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format that supports re-use, or to request the transfer of your personal data to another person.
Right to rectification
. You have the right to obtain rectification of any inaccurate or incomplete personal data we hold about you without undue delay.
Right to erasure
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to erase your personal data without undue delay, such as if the continued processing of that personal data is not justified.
Right to restriction
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to limit the purposes for which we process your personal data, such as where the accuracy of the personal data is contested by you.
Right to withdraw consent
. There are certain circumstances where we require your consent to process your personal data. In these instances, and if you have provided consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. If you withdraw your consent, this will not affect the lawfulness of our use of your personal data before your withdrawal.
You also have the right to object to any processing based on our legitimate interests. There may be compelling reasons for us continuing to process your personal data, and we will assess and inform you if that is the case. You can object to marketing activities for any reason at any time
.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint to your local data protection authority. If you are based in the EU, information about how to contact your local data protection authority is available
here
. If you are based in:
the UK, your local data protection authority is the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (
https://ico.org.uk/global/contact-us/
).
Switzerland, your local data protection authorities is the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (
https://www.edoeb.admin.ch/edoeb/en/home/the-fdpic/contact/address.html
).
Ireland, your local data protection authority is the Data Protection Commission (
https://www.dataprotection.ie/en/contact/how-contact-us
).
If you wish to exercise one of these rights, please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request Form
.
Due to the confidential nature of data processing, we may ask you to provide proof of identity when exercising the above rights to verify your identity.
12. EU-US DATA PRIVACY FRAMEWORK, UK EXTENSION TO THE EU-US DPF, AND THE SWISS-US DATA PRIVACY FRAMEWORK PRINCIPLES
Klaviyo complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Klaviyo has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (“EU-U.S. DPF Principles”) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Klaviyo has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (“Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles”) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Klaviyo’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF).
In the context of an onward transfer, Klaviyo has responsibility for the processing of personal information it receives under the EU-U.S. DPF and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf.  Klaviyo shall remain liable under the Principles if its agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the Principles, unless Klaviyo proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
In compliance with the EU-U.S DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S DPF, and the Swiss-U.S DPF Principles, Klaviyo commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the EU-U.S DPF, the UK extension to the EU-U.S DPF, and the Swiss-U.S Data Privacy Framework Principles. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints should first contact:
Privacy@klaviyo.com
Klaviyo has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the Data Privacy Framework program to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
here
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration through the Data Privacy Framework Panel. For more information on this option, please see Annex I of the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles,
here
.
13.  CONTACT US
If you have any questions or concerns about how Klaviyo uses your personal data, you can contact us:
Directly at
privacy@klaviyo.com
.
Via our appointed EU Representative, the European Data Protection Office (“
EDPO
”), by contacting the EDPO
on their online webform at:
Ireland (EU GDPR):
https://edpo.com/gdpr-data-request/
UK GDPR:
https://edpo.com/uk-gdpr-data-request/
Swiss FADP:
https://edpo.com/swiss-data-request/
by mail at the applicable address set forth below:
Ireland (EU):
EDPO
Ground Floor
71 Lower Baggot Street
Dublin D02 P593
IRELAND
United Kingdom:
EDPO UK
8 Northumberland Avenue
London WC2N 5BY
UNITED KINGDOM
Switzerland:
EDPO Switzerland
Rue de Lausanne 37
1201 Geneva
SWITZERLAND
Back to top ⬆︎
Previous versions:
October 10, 2023
June 29, 2023
December 9, 2022
December 30, 2019
Sub-policy 3
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy:
Skip to Content
Updated March 2, 2023
Privacy Policy
How Shopify handles your data
Table of Contents
Introduction
Our values
Why we process your information
Your rights over your information
Where we send your information
How long do we retain your information
Our use of Machine Learning
How we protect your information
How we use “cookies” and other tracking technologies
How you can reach us
United States Regional Privacy Notice
Introduction
In our mission to make commerce better for everyone at Shopify, we collect and use information about you, our
merchants using Shopify
to power your business
customers
who shop at a Shopify-powered business
partners
who develop apps for merchants to use, build stores on behalf of merchants, refer potential entrepreneurs to Shopify, or otherwise help merchants operate or improve their Shopify-powered business
users of Shopify apps
and services like
Shop
or
Shop Pay
visitors to
Shopify’s websites
, or anyone contacting
Shopify support
This Privacy Policy will help you better understand how we collect, use, and share your personal information. If we change our privacy practices, we may update this privacy policy. If any changes are significant, we will let you know (for example, through the Shopify admin or by email).
Our values
Trust is the foundation of the Shopify platform and includes trusting us to do the right thing with your information. Three main values guide us as we develop our products and services. These values should help you better understand how we think about your information and privacy.
Your information belongs to you
We carefully analyze what types of information we need to provide our services, and we try to limit the information we collect to only what we really need. Where possible, we delete or anonymize this information when we no longer need it. When building and improving our products, our engineers work closely with our privacy and security teams to build with privacy in mind. In all of this work our guiding principle is that your information belongs to you, and we aim to only use your information to your benefit.
We protect your information from others
If a third party requests your personal information, we will refuse to share it unless you give us permission or we are legally required. When we are legally required to share your personal information, we will tell you in advance, unless we are legally forbidden.
We help merchants and partners meet their privacy obligations
Many of the merchants and partners using Shopify do not have the benefit of a dedicated privacy team, and it is important to us to help them meet their privacy obligations. To do this, we try to build our products and services so they can easily be used in a privacy-friendly way. We also provide detailed FAQs and documentation covering the most important privacy topics, and respond to privacy-related questions we receive.
Why we process your information
We generally process your information when we need to do so to fulfill a contractual obligation (for example, to process your subscription payments to use the Shopify platform), or where we or someone we work with needs to use your personal information for a reason related to their business (for example, to provide you with a service). Laws in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and in the United Kingdom (“UK”) call these reasons “legitimate interests.” These “legitimate interests” include:
preventing risk and fraud
answering questions or providing other types of support
helping merchants find and use apps through our app store
providing and improving our products and services
providing reporting and analytics
testing out features or additional services
assisting with marketing, advertising, or other communications
We only process personal information for these “legitimate interests” after considering the potential risks to your privacy and balancing any risks with certain measures—for example, by providing clear transparency into our privacy practices, offering you control over your personal information where appropriate, limiting the information we keep, limiting what we do with your information, who we send your information to, how long we keep your information, or the technical measures we use to protect your information.
We may also process your personal information where you have provided your consent. In particular, where we cannot rely on an alternative legal basis for processing, where you direct us to transfer information to a third party, where we receive your data from a third party is sourced and it already comes with consent or where we are required by law to ask for your consent (including in the context of some of our sales and marketing activities). At any time, you have a right to withdraw your consent by changing your communication choices, opting out from our communications or by contacting us.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant, to understand our purposes for processing, categories of recipients and legal basis for processing for each type of personal data.
Your rights over your information
We believe you should be able to access and control your personal information no matter where you live. Depending on how you use Shopify, you may have the right to request access to, correct, amend, delete, port to another service provider, restrict, or object to certain uses of your personal information. We will not charge you more or provide you with a different level of service if you exercise any of these rights. Please note that a number of these rights apply only in certain circumstances, and all of these rights may be limited by law.
If you buy something from or otherwise provide your information to a Shopify-powered store and wish to exercise these rights over information about your purchase or interaction, you need to directly contact the merchant you interacted with. We are a processor and process information on their behalf. We will of course help our merchants to fulfill these requests to the extent required by law, such as by giving them the tools to do so and by answering their questions.
If you are a merchant, partner, Shop user, Shopify employee, website visitor or other individual that Shopify has a direct relationship with, please submit your data subject request through our
online portal
. Please note that if you send us a request relating to your personal information, we have to make sure that it is you before we can respond. In order to do so, we may use a third party to collect and verify identification documents. Further information about rights available to US residents can be found below under the header “United States Regional Privacy Notice”.
If you are not happy with our response to a request, you can contact us to resolve the issue. If you are located in the EEA or UK, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection or privacy authority at any time.
Finally, because there is no common understanding about what a
“Do Not Track”
signal is supposed to mean, we don’t respond to those signals in any particular way.
Where we send your information
We are a Canadian company, but we work with and process data about individuals across the world. To operate our business, we may send your personal information outside of your state, province, or country, including to the United States. This data may be subject to the laws of the countries where we send it. We take steps to protect your information when we send your information across borders.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant.
Transfers outside of Europe and Switzerland
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, your personal information is controlled by our Irish affiliate, Shopify International Ltd. Your information is then sent to other Shopify locations and to service providers who may be located in other regions, including Canada (where we are based) and the United States. When we send your personal information outside of the EEA, UK or Switzerland, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, when we send your personal information to Canada it is protected under Canadian law, which the European Commission has found adequately protects your information. If we then send this personal information outside of Canada (for example, when we send this information to our
Subprocessors
), this information is protected by contractual commitments that are comparable to those provided in the
Standard Contractual Clauses.
Finally, while we do what we can to protect your information, we may at times be legally required to disclose your personal information (for example, if we receive a valid court order). For information about how we respond to such orders, please review our
Guidelines for Legal Requests
.
How long do we retain your information
We will retain your personal data only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we have collected it. To determine the appropriate retention period, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of your personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means and the applicable legal requirements. We will also retain and use your personal information to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our policies. If you stop using our services or if you delete your account with us, we will delete your information or store your information in an aggregated and anonymized format.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant, for further details on the retention of your personal information.
Our use of Machine Learning
One of the ways in which we are able to help merchants using Shopify is by using techniques like “machine learning” (some laws, including certain EEA and UK laws, may refer to this as “automated decision-making”) to help us improve our services. When we use machine learning, we either: (1) still have a human being involved in the process (and so are not fully automated); or (2) use machine learning in ways that don’t have legal or similarly significant effects (for example, reordering how apps might appear when you visit the app store).
How we protect your information
Our teams work tirelessly to protect your information, and to ensure the security and integrity of our platform. We also have independent auditors assess the security of our data storage and systems that process financial information. However, we all know that no method of transmission over the Internet, and method of electronic storage, can be 100% secure. This means we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your personal information. You can find more information about our security measures at
/ie/security
.
How we use “cookies” and other tracking technologies
We use
cookies
and similar tracking technologies on our website and when providing our services. For more information about how we use these technologies, including a list of other companies that place cookies on our sites, a list of cookies that we place when we power a merchant’s store, and an explanation of how you can opt out of certain types of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
How you can reach us
If you would like to ask about, make a request relating to, or complain about how we process your personal information, please contact
Shopify Support
, or mail us at one of the addresses below. If you would like to submit a legally binding request to demand someone else’s personal information (for example, if you have a subpoena or court order), please review our
Guidelines for Legal Requests
.
If you are a merchant, partner, Shop user, Shopify employee, website visitor or other individual that Shopify has a direct relationship with and you are located in the EEA or UK, Shopify International Ltd is the controller of your personal data. If you buy something from or otherwise provide your information to a Shopify-powered store, the merchant is your data controller and we are acting as a processor on their behalf.
If you have questions about how a merchant or store processes your personal information, you should contact the merchant or visit their privacy policy.
Shopify Commerce Singapore Pte. Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
77 Robinson Road,
#13-00 Robinson 77,
Singapore 068896
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, the Middle East, South America, or Africa:
Shopify International Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Intertrust Ireland
2nd Floor 1-2 Victoria Buildings
Haddington Road
Dublin 4, D04 XN32
Ireland
If you are located in Asia, Australia, or New Zealand:
Shopify Commerce Singapore Pte. Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
77 Robinson Road,
#13-00 Robinson 77,
Singapore 068896
United States Regional Privacy Notice
This United States Regional Privacy Notice (“US Notice”) supplements our Privacy Policy and all supplemental privacy policies on
www.shopify.com
(together, the “Shopify Privacy Policies”).
This US Notice is for individuals residing in certain US states and is designed to help you better understand how we collect, use, and disclose your personal information and, depending on how you use Shopify and where you reside, how to exercise available rights under various applicable privacy laws in the US, specifically the California Consumer Privacy Act, the Colorado Privacy Act, the Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and Online Monitoring, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act, and the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (collectively, the “US Privacy Laws”).
What information we collect and share about you
To provide our apps and services to you, we must process information about you, including personal information.
We do not “sell” your personal information as that term is defined under US Privacy Laws.
Here is a summary of the categories of personal information we may have collected about you over the past 12 months and with whom we may have disclosed that information to, depending on how you use Shopify.
Categories of personal information collected
Recipients of personal information
Identifiers, including name, email address, mailing address, phone number;
Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute, including name, mailing and billing address, phone number, credit or debit card information;
Commercial information, including products you purchase, place in your shopping cart, favorite or review (if you are a customer) and information you provide us about you and your business (if you are a merchant);
Photos and videos, which may include face imagery, if you choose to provide them.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including information regarding the device and browser you use, network connection, IP address, and how you browse through our apps and sites;
Geolocation data, including your mailing and billing address;
Inferences, or information derived from other personal information about you, which could include your preferences, interests, and other information used to personalize your experience;
Other information you provide; and
Sensitive personal information, which may include:
Government-issued identifiers, including social security, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number;
Your account access credentials (such as account log-in, financial account, debit or credit card number in combination with any required security access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account);
Your device’s precise location (if you are a Shop App user, but only when you allow Shop to access this information);
Information you voluntarily disclose that may reveal certain characteristics about you such as your racial or ethnic origin or sexual orientation
The contents of email messages in the email inboxes that you connect to your Shop account, and information from email messages you transfer to the app to be included in your order history (if you use Shop).
Companies who help us provide you with our services, including cloud storage providers, payment processors, fulfillment partners, security vendors, email providers, marketplaces and data analytics vendors;
Advertisers and marketing vendors;
Merchants whose shops you visit or make purchases from;
Partners who provide a range of services to merchants, such as by developing apps or themes for use by merchants, serving as an affiliate that refers potential merchants to us, or helping merchants build or manage stores;
Law enforcement or other third parties in connection with legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Why we collect and share your Personal Information
We use and share your personal information for the purposes set out in the Shopify Privacy Policies. For categories of sensitive personal information that we collect, we only use or disclose such information either with your specific consent when required, or as otherwise permitted by law.
Sources of Personal Information
To make commerce better for everyone at Shopify, we collect and use personal information provided by:
You: We collect the information you provide when you use our platform, including when you sign up for Shopify as a merchant, visit a Shopify-powered store, fill in order information, visit one of Shopify’s websites or contact Shopify support. We collect account and payment information you provide to us (including information about your business if you are a merchant), Shopify stores or items you save to favorites, purchases you make, reviews you post, and how you otherwise interact or communicate with stores or other users on our apps or services. We also collect information about how you browse through our apps and sites, including search terms you may enter.
Your device(s): We collect information from and about the devices you use, including computers, phones, and other web-connected devices you use to access our apps or services, and we combine this information across different devices you use.
Third parties: We receive information from partners who help us provide you with our services including the following:
Email providers. If you use the Shop App and you connect your third party inboxes, such as Gmail or Outlook (according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law), we receive information to identify shopping-related emails and display within Shop information about specific orders you have made, stores you have engaged with in the past, and other related information.
Service Providers. We receive information from our service providers, who help us provide services to our merchants, like reviewing accounts for fraud or other concerns.
Marketplaces. If you use the Shop App, we receive information about purchases you have made from other marketplaces or platforms, such as Amazon, that you choose to connect through Shop. This information helps us to provide and improve Shop, to personalize your experience using our apps and services, and to determine if you are eligible for specific offers or payment methods.
Subprocessors. We work with third party subprocessors for cloud hosting, content delivery, data analysis, internal logging, fulfillment services and email transmission, among others, to provide you with our services. For more information, see Shopify’s subprocessors.
Analytics and cookie providers. We receive information through our use of cookies, social plugins (such as the Facebook “like” button), pixels and tags for business purposes, such as providing information to help measure how users interact with our website content. For more information about how we use these technologies, see our Cookie Policy.
How long we keep your information
Because we need your personal information to provide Shopify services, we generally keep your personal information, including sensitive personal information, while you use Shopify products or services or until you tell us to delete your information. We may also keep personal information to comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests.
If you are a merchant operating a Shopify-powered store, and you close the store, stop paying your subscription fees, or we terminate your account, we retain store information for two years before we begin the deletion process.
When you visit or make a purchase from a merchant’s Shopify-powered store, we act as a service provider or processor for the merchant, and the merchant, not Shopify, decides how long your information is retained.
Your rights over your information
Depending on where you live, how you use Shopify, and subject to certain exceptions, you may have some or all of the following rights:
Right to Know: The right to request that we disclose to you the personal information we collect, use, or disclose about you, and information about our data practices.
Right to Request Correction: The right to request that we correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
Right to Request Deletion: The right to request that we delete personal information that we have collected about you.
To exercise your rights, including the “right to know” and “right to delete,” please submit a request through our online portal. If you use Shop or Shop Pay, please visit
https://shop.app/delete-account
for instructions on how to request deletion of your information.
If you have visited or made a purchase from a merchant’s Shopify-powered store, please contact the specific merchant directly. If you make a request to us, we will forward your request to the relevant merchant.
Please note that to protect your information and the integrity of our products and services, we may need to verify your identity before processing your request. In some cases we may need to collect additional information to verify your identity, such as your email address or a government issued ID.
Under US Privacy Laws, you may also designate an authorized agent to make these requests on your behalf. If you use an authorized agent to submit a request, we may need to collect additional information, such as a government issued ID, to verify your identity before processing your request to protect your information.
For information on the CCPA requests we have received, please see here. In certain states, you may have the right to appeal our decision regarding a request related to these rights. If you wish to appeal a decision, please contact Shopify Support.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of these rights.
How you can reach us
If you would like to ask about or have concerns about how we process your personal information, please contact Shopify Support. If you want to make a request relating to your personal information, please contact us using the methods set out in the section immediately above.
We use cookies (and other similar technologies) for many purposes, including to improve your experience on our site and for ads and analytics. Click "Accept all" to accept these uses. Read more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Reject all
Accept all
Sub-policy 4
https://www.paypal.com/uk/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-prev:
Sorry.
We were not able to process your request. Please try again later.
Sub-policy 5
https://www.shopify.ie/legal/terms-payments-us:
Skip to Content
Shopify Payments Terms of Service - United States
The Terms and Conditions described herein constitute a legal agreement
(“Agreement” or “Shopify Payments Terms”) between you (if your business
is a sole proprietorship) or your business (if you are signing up on
behalf of a corporation or other legal entity) (the “Merchant”, “you” or
“your”) and Shopify Payments (USA) Inc., organized under the laws of
Delaware with offices at 251 Little Falls Drive, Wilmington, Delaware
19808 (“Shopify”, “we”, “us”, or “our”).
Table of Contents
A. The Shopify Payments Service
B. Getting a Payments Services Account
C. Processing Card Transactions and Receiving Your Funds
D. Termination and Other General Legal Terms
A. The Shopify Payments Service
Our Role
The Shopify Payments service (“Shopify Payments”
 or the “Payments Services”) is a: (i) payment account boarding;
 (ii) payment underwriting; and, (iii) payment data transmission
 service that helps you integrate with a payment processor (each a
 “Processor”), as described more fully in this Agreement. The
 Payments Services may also apply to your use of point-of-sale
 equipment (“POS Equipment”), subject to availability and to your
 election to procure the same. You hereby appoint us as your agent
 to deliver information and instructions on your behalf to a
 Processor.
Under the separate
Shopify Platform Terms of
 Service
(the “Shopify
 Platform Terms”), Shopify Inc. provides you with its online
 storefront, shopping cart, store management, marketing, and
 other services (collectively, the “Shopify Platform Services”).
 The Shopify Platform Terms are incorporated herein by reference
 and by accepting this Agreement you are also accepting them.
Neither Shopify Inc. nor Shopify Payments (USA) Inc. is a
 bank, payment institution, or money services business, but are
 instead, respectively, a supplier of the Shopify Platform
 Services supplied under the Shopify Platform Terms and of the
 Payments Services under this Agreement.
The Processor
The Processor under this Agreement is either
 (i) Stripe, Inc., organized under the laws of Delaware (“Stripe”),
 or (ii) PayPal, Inc., organized under the laws of Delaware
 (“PayPal”), each of which is a technical services provider and
 each of whom may offer the services as an agent of one or more
 financial institutions in United States (each, a “Financial
 Services Provider”). The processing and settlement of Transactions
 (as defined below) (“Payment Processing”) is carried out by a
 Processor and any of its Financial Services Providers under the
 separate terms of service listed below. Shopify, in its sole and
 absolute discretion, reserves the right to determine the Processor
 that shall perform Payment Processing services for each
 Transaction.
Where Stripe is the Processor, Payment Processing is subject to
 the
Stripe Connected Account
 Agreement
, including
 the
United States Stripe Services
 Agreement
and the applicable
Financial Services Terms
, and to
 the extent you use a payment method that is subject to additional
 terms, the
Payment Terms
(collectively, the “Stripe Terms”). Where PayPal is the Processor,
 Payment Processing is subject to the
Platform Seller Account
 Agreement
(the “PayPal Terms”, and together with the Stripe Terms, the
 “Processor Terms”). By accepting this Agreement, you are also
 accepting and agreeing to be bound by all of the Processor Terms,
 which, in each case, is the legal agreement between you and the
 applicable Processor.
Shopify is not a party to any of the Processor Terms and is not
 liable to you in respect thereof. By accepting this Agreement and
 the Processor Terms you are agreeing to the creation of an account
 with each Processor for Payment Processing (each a “Processor
 Account”). We reserve the right to change the Processors, subject
 to the terms of our agreement with each Processor. In the event of
 any inconsistency between this Agreement and any of the Processor
 Terms, this Agreement shall prevail, except in the event of any
 inconsistency between this Agreement and the relevant Processor
 Terms concerning Payment Processing or the Processor Account, in
 which case the applicable Processor Terms shall prevail.
The Processor’s role is to accept and process credit card, debit
 card and other types of payments (collectively “Cards”) with
 respect to sales of your products and services through
 internet-based transactions (“Card Not Present Transactions" or
 “CNP Transactions”). If applicable, POS Equipment permits
 transmission of data to the Processor from in-person,
 point-of-sale transactions (“Card Present Transactions" or “CP
 Transactions”), as well as manually entered transactions (“Keyed
 Transactions”). CNP Transactions, CP Transactions and Keyed
 Transactions shall be referred to herein, collectively, as
 “Transactions”.
Shop Pay Installments
You may enable Shop Pay Installments through your merchant portal
 or through your use of Shop Pay Installments, and by accepting this
 Agreement, you accept and agree to be bound by the
Shop Pay
 Installments Terms
and the
Merchant Agreement (Shop Pay Installments)
with Affirm.
Your Role
To utilize the Services, you must be a business located in
 the United States.
The Payments Services
Shopify hereby grants you a
 non-exclusive, non-transferable, non-sublicensable, limited,
 revocable right to use the Payments Services (the “License”).
 The License shall be for the term of this Agreement only.
 Neither the License nor any other provision hereof shall grant
 any rights in the Payments Services or other intellectual
 property rights except the limited License of use set out above.
You shall not: (i) permit any third party to access the Payments
 Services, including, but not limited to, your Shopify Admin on
 our website (the “Shopify Admin”), except as permitted herein,
 and to carry out Transactions; (ii) create derivate works based
 on the Payments Services; (iii) copy, frame or mirror any part
 of the content of the Payments Services, other than copying or
 framing for your internal business purposes; (iv) reverse
 engineer, disassemble, decompile, or otherwise attempt to
 discover the source code or trade secrets for any of the
 Payments Services; or, (v) access the Payments Services in order
 to build a competitive product or service.
It is your responsibility to obtain your customers’ consent to
 be billed for each Transaction or, as the case may be, on a
 recurring basis, in compliance with applicable legal
 requirements and Visa Europe Ltd., Visa U.S.A., Inc., Visa
 Canada Inc. and Visa International (collectively, “Visa”),
 MasterCard International Incorporated (“MasterCard”), American
 Express or other applicable Card networks’ (such networks being,
 collectively, the “Payment Networks”) payment rules (the
 “Payment Network Rules”).
POS Equipment
If applicable, you may elect to purchase POS Equipment from Shopify that will allow you to accept CP Transactions and Keyed Transactions. POS hardware may be purchased on the
Shopify Hardware Store
(the “POS Equipment Store”). POS software may be downloaded for iOS devices from the Apple App Store under the title “Shopify POS” or “Shopify”. Your use of the Shopify POS hardware and software is subject to the applicable sections of the
Shopify Platform Terms of Service
.
Payment Methods
The Payments Services support most
 Payment Network Cards, including credit, debit, pre-paid, or
 gift cards. You assume sole and exclusive responsibility for the
 use of the Payments Services. You also assume sole and exclusive
 responsibility for Transactions under the Processor Terms. You
 are solely responsible for verifying the identity of customers
 and of the eligibility of a presented Card used to purchase your
 products and services, and Shopify does not guarantee or assume
 any liability for Transactions authorized and completed that may
 later be reversed or charged back (see section D5 below). You
 are solely responsible for all reversed or charged back
 transactions regardless of the reason for, or timing of the
 reversal or chargeback. Shopify or the Processor may add or
 remove one or more types of Payment Networks or Cards, in their
 sole discretion, at any time, without prior notice to you.
Customer Service
Shopify will use its commercially
 reasonable efforts to provide you with customer support to help
 resolve issues relating to the Payments Services. The Processor
 retains sole and exclusive responsibility for Payment Processing
 of Transactions, including the settlement of funds, but Shopify
 will provide reasonable assistance in liaising between you and
 the relevant Processor concerning the Payment Processing services.
 You assume sole and exclusive responsibility for providing customer
 service or support to your customers for any and all issues
 related to your products and services, including, but not
 limited to, issues arising from the processing of Cards through
 the Payments Services.
Taxes
You have sole and exclusive responsibility to
 determine what, if any, taxes apply to the sale of your goods
 and services and/or the payments you receive in connection with
 your use of the Payments Services ("Taxes"). It is solely your
 responsibility to assess, collect, report, or remit the correct
 Taxes to the proper tax authority, whether in customers’
 jurisdictions, your jurisdiction or elsewhere. We are not
 obligated to determine whether Taxes apply, or
 calculate, collect, report, or remit any Taxes to any tax
 authority, arising from any Transaction on your behalf. 
 To the extent that Shopify is required to collects and remits 
 any taxes arising from any Transaction, Shopify may, at its 
 sole discretion, calculate and deduct, or request that a Processor 
 deduct, the corresponding amounts from any accounts associated 
 with your Shopify Payments Account, including the applicable 
 Processor Account or Reserve Account, and pay those amounts 
 to the proper tax authority. Shopify retains the right, but 
 not the obligation, at its sole discretion, to complete and 
 file tax or related reports with tax authorities regarding 
 Transactions in those jurisdictions where Shopify deems such 
 reporting necessary. You hereby indemnify and hold Shopify 
 harmless from and against any and all liability related
 to Taxes and filings made by Shopify in respect thereof.
You agree to receive all federal and state tax statements in an
 electronic format and acknowledge that paper tax statements
 will not be provided. We will notify you when an electronic
 statement is available by posting a notice in your Shopify Admin
 or emailing it to the email address listed in your Shopify Account.
 Specific instructions for access and download will be included.
In the event you withdraw consent with the Shopify Platform Terms
 and/or these terms, you will receive all electronic tax-related
 statements for the duration of time the agreement was authorized.
Your Customers
If prohibited by law, you will not impose
any fee or surcharge on a customer that seeks to use an eligible
Card. You will provide an informational slip or receipt to your
customer at the conclusion of the Transaction that includes all
information required under Payment Network Rules and applicable
law.
Security
We maintain commercially reasonable
administrative, technical and physical procedures to protect all
the personal information regarding you and your customers that
is stored in our servers from unauthorized access, accidental
loss, or modification. Shopify cannot, however, guarantee that
unauthorized third parties will never be able to defeat those
measures or use such personal information for improper purposes.
Data Security
You assume full responsibility for the
security of data on your website or otherwise in your possession
or control. You agree to comply with all applicable laws and
rules in connection with your collection, security, and
dissemination of any personal, financial, Card, or Transaction
information (collectively, “Data", and as pertains to your
customers, “Cardholder Data”). You agree that at all times you
shall be compliant with applicable Payment Card Industry Data
Security Standards (“PCI-DSS”) and, as applicable, the Payment
Application Data Security Standards (“PA-DSS”). You agree to
promptly provide Shopify with documentation evidencing your
compliance with PCI-DSS and/or PA-DSS upon request. You also
agree that you will use only PCI-DSS and PA-DSS compliant
service providers in connection with the storage or transmission
of Card information, including a cardholder’s account number,
expiration date, and CVV2. You must not store CVV2 data at any
time. Information on PCI-DSS can be found on the
PCI Council’s
website
. It is your
responsibility to comply with these standards and all the
Payment Network Rules. We may request additional security measures
at any time and reserve the right to adjust these requirements at
our discretion.
Audit Right
If Shopify believes that a security breach,
personal data breach, or other compromise of data may have
occurred, Shopify may require you to have a third-party auditor
that is approved by Shopify conduct a security audit of your
systems and facilities and issue a report to be provided to
Shopify and, at Shopify’s discretion, to the Processor, its
Financial Services Provider(s), Payment Networks, and law
enforcement, at your sole cost and expense.
Privacy
Your privacy and the protection of your data
are very important to us. You acknowledge that you have
received, read in full, and agree with the terms of our
Privacy
Policy
, our
Data
Processing Addendum
, and each
Processor’s Privacy Policy (for Stripe see
here
and for PayPal see
here
).
Our Privacy Policy and Data Processing Addendum are hereby
incorporated into this Agreement. Shopify’s Privacy Policy and
each Processor’s Privacy Policy contain important information
about the collection, use, retention, and disclosure of personal
information, as well as other important matters, and explains
how and for what purposes we and the Processor collect, use,
retain, disclose and safeguard the information you provide to
us. You agree that Shopify’s Privacy Policy and each Processor’s
Privacy Policy may be modified at Shopify’s or the Processor’s
option, if necessary, and you will check each Privacy Policy on
a regular basis. You also acknowledge that the Processors are
required to report your business name and the name of your
principals to the Member Alert to Control High-Risk merchants
list of MasterCard (“MATCH List”) maintained by MasterCard and
accessed and updated by American Express, to the VMAS database
upheld by Visa Europe, and/or to the Consortium Merchant
Negative File maintained by Discover, if applicable, pursuant to
the requirements of the Payment Network Rules. Additionally, you
agree that Shopify’s collection, use, retention, and disclosure
of personal information is subject to our Data Processing
Addendum.
We will at all times comply with the provisions of applicable
data protection law, including the EU General Data Protection
Regulation (“GDPR”), as applicable. If we process any of your
personal data when performing our obligations under this
Agreement, we will do so as a “data controller”, as defined by the
GDPR. If we process any Cardholder Data on your behalf, we and you
both agree that it is our intention that you shall be the “data
controller” and we shall be the “data processor” in relation to
that data, as those terms are defined in the GDPR. We shall
process the personal data only in accordance with the terms of
this Agreement and any lawful instructions reasonably given by you
to us from time to time. Additionally, you acknowledge that each
Processor acts as a “data controller”, or as otherwise agreed
between you and the Processor, with regards to any personal data
that they may process under this Agreement and that we are not
responsible for how they process such data.
We will notify you (within a reasonable time frame) if we
receive a request from a person to have access to, or to erase
that person’s personal data, a complaint or request relating to
your obligations under applicable data protection legislation,
or any other communication relating directly to the processing
of any personal data in connection with this Agreement. You
acknowledge that such requests may be subject to independent
legal retention or confidentiality requirements, as permitted by
the GDPR.
We will provide you with reasonable co-operation and assistance
in relation to any complaint or request made in respect of any
personal data processed by us on your behalf, including by
providing you with details of the complaint or request, helping
you to comply with any data subject access requests (within the
relevant timescales set out in applicable data protection
legislation), and providing you with any personal data we hold
in relation to a person making a complaint or request (again,
within a reasonable timescale).
You acknowledge that we are relying on you for direction as to
the extent to which we are entitled to use and process the
personal data in the Cardholder Data that you provide us with.
Consequently, we will not be liable for any claim brought by a
data subject arising from any action or omission by us, to the
extent that such action or omission resulted from your
instruction.
You consent to the exchange of your information between the
account(s) you have established through the Shopify Platform
Services and the Payments Services established under this
Agreement. Shopify will commingle such accounts and refer to them
together in this Agreement as the “Shopify Payments Account”.
Additionally, when you elect to use a third party sales
channel integration made available through the Shopify
Platform Services (e.g. choosing to sell your products on
Facebook) your transactions on such third party sales channel
(“Third Party Channel”) may be processed by Shopify Payments.
Where Shopify Payments process transactions on your behalf on
a Third Party Channel, you agree and consent to Shopify
sharing or disclosing your data (including personal
information) with the operator of the Third Party Channel in
the context of a data breach or audit, if Shopify is required
to do in connection with its performance of the Payments
Services.
Where a data subject is located in the U.K. or the European
Economic Area that data subject's personal data will be processed
by Shopify International Limited, in accordance with our Privacy
Policy. As part of providing the Payments Services, this personal
data may be transferred to other regions, including to Canada and
the United States. Additionally, in order to process, use, record,
and disclose your personal information, information related to
your business, and Data, we or our agents may transfer such
information to and receive it from the Processor, its Financial
Services Provider(s), or their respective agents and, in so doing,
we may transmit or possess it outside of your jurisdiction.
Additionally, in order to provide the Payments Services, we use
a variety of third party “sub-processors” that fall into many
broad categories—for example, we use sub-processors to help us:
(i) protect you and Shopify from potentially risky transactions,
security threats, or fraud; (ii) perform administrative tasks;
(iii) deliver portions of the Payments Services (e.g., third
parties that work with us to actually process credit card
payments or conduct any shipping); (iv) develop and improve our
products and the Payments Services; (v) generate analytics or
other information relating to the Payments Services; and, (vi)
build our technical infrastructure (e.g., using cloud storage
providers or information security vendors). By using the
Payments Services, you consent to our use of sub-processors,
which is described in more detail in our
Privacy
Policy
.
Privacy of Others
You represent to us that you are in
compliance with all applicable privacy laws and that you
maintain a publicly accessible privacy policy that accurately
discloses how you collect, use, and disclose personal data,
including through the Payments Services. Additionally, you
represent to us that you have obtained all necessary rights and
consents under applicable law to allow us and the Processor to
collect, use, retain, and disclose any Cardholder Data that you
provide to, or authorize us to collect, including information
that we may collect directly from you of your customers via
cookies or other means and to use that data to provide the
Payments Services (e.g., to process Transactions and to screen
for fraud or compliance purposes).
Further, you represent that we will not be in breach of any such
laws by collecting, receiving, using, and disclosing such
information in connection with the Payments Services as
described in our
Privacy
Policy
. As between the
parties to this Agreement, you are solely responsible for
disclosing to your customers that we will collect and process
their Cardholder Data in our supply of the Payments Services to
you, and that in so doing we may transmit or possess it outside
of your or their jurisdiction, and that it may be subject to
disclosure as required by applicable law.
If you receive information about others, including cardholders
and other customers, through the use of the Payments Services,
you must keep such information confidential and only use it in
connection with the Payments Services or as otherwise permitted
by the subject of such information.
You may not disclose or distribute any such information to a
third party or use any such information for marketing purposes
unless you receive the express consent of the subject thereof to
do so. You may not disclose Cardholder Data to any third party
other than in connection with processing a Transaction requested
by your customer.
Restricted Use
You are required to obey all laws,
rules, and regulations applicable to your use of the Payments
Services (e.g., including those governing financial services,
consumer protections, unfair competition, anti-discrimination,
or false advertising). In addition to any other requirements or
restrictions set forth in this Agreement, you shall not: (i)
utilize the credit available on any Card to provide cash
advances to cardholders; (ii) submit any Transaction for
processing that does not arise from your sale of goods or
service to a customer; (iii) act as a payment intermediary or
aggregator or otherwise resell the Payments Services on behalf
of any third party; (iv) send what you believe to be potentially
fraudulent authorizations or fraudulent Transactions; (v)
use the Payments Services or the Payment Processing services in
a manner that a Payment Network reasonably believes to be an
abuse of the Payment Network or a violation of the Payment
Network Rules; or, (vi) work around any of the technical
limitations of the Payments Services or Shopify’s checkout, use
any tool to enable features or functionalities that are otherwise
disabled in the Payments Services, or decompile, disassemble, or
otherwise reverse engineer the Payments Services, except to the
extent that such restriction is expressly prohibited by law.
You further agree not to permit any third party to do any of the
following: (i) access or attempt to access our systems,
programs, or data that are not made available for public use;
(ii) copy, reproduce, republish, upload, post, transmit, resell,
or distribute, in any way, material from us; (iii) permit any
third party to use and benefit from the Payments Services via a
rental, lease, timesharing, service bureau, or other
arrangement; (iv) transfer any rights granted to you under this
Agreement; (v) work around any of the technical limitations of
the Payments Services or Shopify’s checkout, use any tool to enable features or
functionalities that are otherwise disabled in the Payments
Services, or decompile, disassemble, or otherwise reverse
engineer the Payments Services, except to the extent that such
restriction is expressly prohibited by law; (vi) perform or
attempt to perform any actions that would interfere with the
proper working of the Payments Services, prevent access to or
use of the Payments Services by our other users, or impose an
unreasonable or disproportionately large load on our
infrastructure; or, (vii) otherwise use the Payments Services
except as expressly allowed under this section.
Suspicion of Unauthorized or Illegal Use
We reserve the right to not provide the Payments Services in 
respect of any Transaction you submit that we believe, in our 
sole discretion, is in violation of this Agreement, any other 
Shopify or Processor agreement, or exposes you, Shopify, the
Processors, or any other third party to actual or potential risk
or harm, including, but not limited to, fraud and other criminal
acts. You are hereby granting us authorization to share information
with law enforcement about you, your Transactions, or
your Shopify Payments Account.
Payment Network Rules
The Payment Networks have established guidelines, bylaws, rules, 
and regulations in the form of the Payment Network Rules. You are 
required to comply with all applicable Payment Network Rules,
including the Payment Network Rules for
Visa
,
MasterCard
and
American
Express
(each as updated from time to time). The Payment Networks may
amend the Payment Network Rules at any time and without notice to
us or to you. Insofar as the terms of this Agreement and/or the
Processor Terms are inconsistent with the Payment Network Rules,
the Payment Network Rules shall prevail. We reserve the right to
amend this Agreement at any time, with notice to you, as may be
necessary to comply with the Payment Network Rules.
Disclosures and Notices
You agree that Shopify can
provide disclosures and notices, including tax forms, that we
deem appropriate regarding the Payments Services to you by
posting such disclosures and notices in your Shopify Admin,
emailing them to the email address listed in your Shopify
Account, or mailing them to the address listed in your Shopify
Account. You also agree that electronic disclosures and notices
have the same meaning and effect as if we had provided you with
a paper copy. Such disclosures and notices shall be considered
to be received by you within twenty-four (24) hours of the time
it is posted to your Shopify Admin or emailed to you, unless we
receive notice that the email was not delivered.
Automatic Reminders
We may use automated telephone
dialing, text messaging systems, and email to provide messages
to you about your Shopify Payments Account. The telephone
messages may be played by a machine automatically when the
telephone is answered, whether answered by you or another party.
These messages may also be recorded by your answering machine or
voicemail. You give us permission to call or send a text message
to any telephone number that you have given us and to play
pre-recorded messages or send text messages with information
about this Agreement or your account over the phone. You agree
that we will not be liable to you for any such calls or
electronic communications even if information is communicated to
an unintended recipient. You understand that when you receive
such calls or electronic communications you may incur a charge
from the company that provides you with telecommunications,
wireless and/or Internet services. You agree that we have no
liability for such charges. You agree to immediately notify us
if you change telephone numbers or are otherwise no longer the
subscriber or customary user of a telephone number or email
address you have previously provided to us.
B. Getting a Payments Services Account
Registration
The Payments Services are only made
 available to persons in United States that operate a business selling
 goods and services. You may not use the Payments Services for
 non-commercial, personal, family, or household purposes. To use
 Shopify Payments for your business, you are required to register
 for a Shopify Payments Account. When you register for a Shopify
 Payments Account, we will collect information such as your name
 (if you are a sole proprietor), your business or trade name,
 your address, email, phone number, business identification or
 registration number, and certain other information that we
 require. We may also collect personal information (including
 name, birthdate, and government-issued identification number)
 about your beneficial owners or principals.
You may register as an individual (sole proprietor) or as a
 corporation or other legal entity. If you register as a
 corporation or other legal entity, you must be authorized to act
 on behalf of such entity, have the authority to bind the entity
 to this Agreement, and you must agree to this Agreement on
 behalf of such entity. If you have so agreed, the term
 "Merchant", “you” or “your” will mean you, the natural person
 acting as a business, if you are a sole proprietor, or if you
 have registered as a corporation or other legal entity, it will
 mean that entity. You understand that by registering for a
 Shopify Payments Account, you are also registering for one or 
 more Processor Account(s) under the Processor Terms and that you
 are simultaneously providing your information to Shopify for the
 purpose of opening a Shopify Payments Account, and to each of 
 the Processors for the purpose of establishing your Processor
 Account.
Company Descriptions and Site URL
As part of your
 registration, you must provide the name under which you do
 business (which may be the business’ legal name or a "doing
 business name") (e.g. MyStore Online Widgets) and a billing
 descriptor. These two fields and your site URL may appear in your
 customers’ credit or debit card statements. To avoid customer
 confusion and Transaction disputes it is important that you
 enter a description that clearly identifies your business. You
 hereby agree to indemnify us from any costs, liabilities,
 losses, or expenses from disputes due to your failure to do so.
Verification and Underwriting
To verify your identity,
 we may require additional information, including your company
 registration number or business number, your HST, GST, or tax
 number, and, if applicable, your date of birth. We may also ask
 for additional information to help verify your identity and
 assess your business risk, including, but not limited, to
 business invoices, reseller authorization or distributor
 information, a driver’s license or other government issued
 identification, or business license, for you or for any of the
 owners or principals of your business. We may ask you for your
 financial statements. We may request your permission to do a
 physical inspection at your place of business and to examine
 books and records that pertain to your compliance with this
 Agreement. Your failure to comply with any of these requests
 may result in suspension or termination of your Shopify 
 Payments Account and any Processor Account you may have. You
 authorize us to retrieve additional information about
 you from third parties and other identification services. We
 reserve the right to hold funds in your Shopify Payments Account
 while awaiting the information requested above. Shopify may use
 your information to apply for card merchant acquiring accounts on
 your behalf with certain Payment Networks (such as American
 Express).
After we have collected and verified all your information, we
 will review your account and determine if you are eligible to
 use the Payments Services. We will notify you once your Shopify
 Payments Account has been either approved or deemed ineligible
 for use of the Payments Services.
By accepting the terms of this Agreement, you are providing us
 with authorization to retrieve information about you by using
 third parties, including credit bureaus and other information
 providers. You acknowledge that such information retrieved may
 include your name, address history, credit history, and other
 data about you. We may periodically update this information to
 determine whether you continue to meet the eligibility
 requirements for a Shopify Payments Account.
You agree that Shopify is permitted to contact and share
 information about you and your application (including whether you
 are approved or declined), your Shopify Payments Account, and the
 Processor Account with the applicable Processor and other third
 parties in order to perform the Payments Services. This includes
 sharing information: (i) about Transactions for regulatory or
 compliance purposes; (ii) for use in connection with the
 management and maintenance of the Payments Services; (iii) to
 create and update our and their customer records about you, and
 to assist us and them in better serving you; and, (iv) to
 conduct our and their risk management process.
Designated Country
In registering for a Shopify Payments
 Account, you are obliged to identify the location from where you
 are operating the business that will use the Payments Services
 in the United States. By registering for a Shopify Payments Account,
 you are confirming that you are either a legal resident of the 
 United States or you are duly established and, if necessary, 
 registered or licensed as a business entity authorized to conduct 
 business in the United States. The Payments Services and Shopify 
 Payments Account may only be used in the United States. By accepting 
 this Agreement, you confirm that you will satisfy these requirements.
Prohibited and Restricted Businesses
Certain categories of
 businesses and business practices are prohibited from using the
 Payments Services (“Prohibited Businesses”), or require additional
 review and approval by us to use the Payments Services
 (“Restricted Businesses”). Prohibited Business and Restricted
 Business categories may be imposed by law or through the Payment
 Network Rules, by Shopify or the requirements of a Processor’s
 Financial Services Providers. The types of business categories and
 business practices that are considered Prohibited Businesses or
 Restricted Businesses are provided by each Processor and can be
 located at the links below:
Stripe Prohibited and Restricted
 Businesses
PayPal Acceptable Use
 Policy
These lists are meant to be representative but not exhaustive. If
 you are uncertain as to whether your business is a Prohibited
 Business or Restricted Business, or you have questions about how
 these requirements apply to you, please
contact
 us
. We, or the
 Processors, may add to or update the Prohibited Business or
 Restricted Business list at any time without notice to you.
C. Processing Card Transactions and Receiving Your Funds
Shopify Payments Fees
You agree to pay the fees for
 processing that are set out in your Shopify Admin, which are
 incorporated herein by reference (the "Processing Fees").
 Processing Fees shall be collected from you by the applicable
 Processor on our behalf in accordance with the Processor Terms.
If applicable, fees for POS Equipment are posted here:
www.shopify.com/pos/hardware
and here:
www.shopify.com/pricing
(the
 “POS Equipment Fees”). At our discretion, POS Equipment Fees
 will be collected on our behalf by the applicable Processor 
 pursuant to the Processor Terms or by such other means as we 
 may prescribe from time to time.
Fees for Shopify Platform Services are collected by Shopify
 pursuant to the
Shopify Platform Terms of
 Service
(the "Shopify
 Platform Services Fees"). Processing Fees, Equipment Fees, and
 Shopify Platform Services Fees shall be referred to herein
 collectively as the "Fees".
You are obligated to pay all applicable taxes, fees and other
 charges imposed by any governmental authority, including,
 without limitation, any value added tax, goods and services tax,
 harmonized sales tax and/or provincial or territorial sales tax,
 on the Payments Services provided under this Agreement. If you
 are tax-exempt, you will provide us with an appropriate
 certificate or other evidence of tax exemption that is
 satisfactory to us.
We reserve the right to change the Fees at any time, subject to
 a thirty (30) day notice period to you in accordance with
 Section A19. If you continue to use the Payments Services and
 the Processor Services for such thirty (30) days, then you are
 deemed to have accepted the change in Fees contemplated by such
 notice. Notwithstanding the thirty (30) day notice period referred
 to above, if Shopify or the Processor suspends, disables, or
 otherwise makes your Shopify Payments Account unavailable to
 you, or if you choose to no longer use Shopify Payments, upon
 your account being reinstated by Shopify or the Processor,
 or if you choose to enable Shopify Payments again, the then
 current Fees shall apply to you.
In addition to the Fees, you are also responsible for any
 penalties and fines imposed on you or on us by any bank, money
 services business, payment network, financial institution, or
 other financial intermediary resulting from your use of the
 Payments Services in a manner not permitted by this Agreement or
 by such financial intermediary’s rules and regulations.
Security Interest
As security for performance of your
 obligations under this Agreement, you grant us a first priority
 lien and security interest on all funds processed and deposited
 into all bank accounts or other financial accounts designated in
 your Shopify Admin to receive funds from the settlement of 
 Transactions (the "Payout Account"), and any other bank accounts associated with your Shopify
 Payments Account, and in any funds processed using the Payment
 Processing services. These security interests and liens will
 secure payment and performance of all of your obligations under
 this Agreement and any other agreements now existing or later
 entered into between us and you, including, without limitation,
 your obligation to pay any amounts due and owing to us. You will
 execute, deliver and pay the fees for any documents we request,
 and authorize Shopify to take any other action necessary including
 registering notice of such security interest in a public registry,
 to create, perfect, maintain, and enforce this security interest.
Our Collection Rights
To the extent permitted by law, we
 may collect any obligations you owe us under this Agreement by
 requesting that a Processor deduct the corresponding amounts
 from a Reserve Account (as that term is defined below) or from
 funds payable to you arising from the settlement of
 Transactions. Fees will be assessed at the time a Transaction is
 processed and will be first deducted from the funds received for
 such Transaction. If these amounts are not sufficient to meet
 your obligations to us, we may charge the payment method
 associated with your Shopify Payments Account for any amounts
 owed to us. Your failure to fully pay amounts that you owe us on
 demand will be a breach of this Agreement. You will be liable
 for our costs associated with collection in addition to the
 amount owed, including, without limitation, attorneys’ fees and
 expenses, costs of any arbitration or court proceeding,
 collection agency fees, and any applicable interest.
Further, we may deduct, or request that a Processor deduct, from
 any accounts associated with your Shopify Payments Account,
 including the applicable Processor Account or Reserve Account, any
 amounts that you owe to us under this Agreement or any other
 agreement you have entered into with us or our affiliates. In
 accordance with the above and the Processor Terms you authorize us
 to debit your Payout Account, without separate notice, to collect
 amounts you owe under this Agreement, pursuant to the
User Bank
 Account Debit
 Authorization
and the
Platform Seller Debit
 Authorization
(each of which shall form part of the “Processor Terms”).
Additionally, we may require a personal guarantee from a
 principal of a business for funds owed under this Agreement. If
 we require a personal guarantee we will specifically inform you
 in advance.
In addition to the amount due, delinquent accounts may be
 charged with fees that are incidental to the collection of
 delinquent accounts and chargebacks, including, but not limited
 to, collection fees and convenience fees and other third-party
 charges.
You hereby explicitly agree that all communication in relation
 to delinquent accounts will be made by electronic mail or by
 phone, as provided to Shopify by you. Such communication may be
 made by Shopify or by anyone on its behalf, including, but not
 limited to, a third-party collection agent.
Reserves
Funds held in reserves are amounts of money set
 aside to cover chargebacks, refunds, or other payment
 obligations under this Agreement (the "Reserve Account"). We, in
 our discretion, will set the terms of any Reserve Account and
 notify you of such terms, which may require that a certain
 amount (including the full amount) of the funds received for a
 Transaction are held for a period of time, or that additional
 amounts are held in the Reserve Account. We, in our discretion,
 may elect to change the terms of a Reserve Account at any
 time, for any reason, based on your payment processing history
 or as requested by our payment processors.
We may require you to fund the Reserve Account by means of: (i)
 any funds payouts made or due to you for Transactions submitted to
 the Payments Services; or, (ii) amounts available in your Payout
 Account by means of ACH debit;
 or, (iii) other sources of funds associated with your Shopify
 Payments Account; or, (iv) requesting that you provide funds to us
 for deposit to the Reserve Account.
You agree that: (i) you are not entitled to any interest or
 other compensation associated with the funds held in the Reserve
 Account; (ii) you have no right to direct that account; (iii)
 you have no legal interest in those funds or that account; and,
 (iv) you may not assign any interest in those funds or that
 account.
Contesting Chargebacks
You or Shopify may elect to
 contest chargebacks assessed to your account. Shopify may
 provide you with assistance, including notifications and
 software to help contest your chargebacks. We do not assume any
 liability for our role or assistance in contesting chargebacks.
You grant us permission to share records or other information
 required with the cardholder, the cardholder’s financial
 institution, and your financial institution to help resolve any
 chargeback. You acknowledge that your failure to provide us with
 complete and accurate information in a timely manner may result
 in an irreversible chargeback being assessed.
If the cardholder’s issuing bank or the Payment Network does not
 resolve a dispute in your favor, we may recover the chargeback
 amount and any associated fees from you as described in this
 Agreement.
We reserve the right, upon notice to you, to charge a fee for
 mediating or investigating chargeback disputes.
D. Termination and Other General Legal Terms
Term
The Agreement is effective upon the date you agree
 to it (by electronically indicating acceptance) and continues so
 long as you use the Payments Services or until terminated by you
 or by Shopify.
Termination
You may terminate this Agreement by closing
 your Shopify Payments Account at any time by following the
 instructions in your Shopify Admin. We may terminate this
 Agreement and close your Shopify Payments Account at any time,
 for any reason, upon notice to you in accordance with Section
 A19 above. We may suspend your Shopify Payments Account and your
 access to the Payments Services and any rights in respect of
 your Shopify Payments Account, or terminate this Agreement, at
 any time, for any reason, including if: (i) we determine that
 you may be ineligible for the Payments Services because of the
 risk associated with your Shopify Payments Account, including,
 without limitation, significant credit or fraud risk, or for any
 other reason; (ii) you do not comply with any of the provisions
 of this Agreement or the Processor Terms; or, (iii) upon request
 of the Payment Network, a Processor, or a Card issuer.
 Termination of the Processor Terms may, at the discretion of
 Shopify, result in a termination of this Agreement. Termination
 of this Agreement shall entitle Shopify to cause each Processor
 to terminate its Processor Terms.
If a Processor terminates its Processor Terms or indicates its
 intention to do so, or if you elect to cease processing with such
 Processor, we have the right, but not the obligation, to offer you
 a substitute payment processor that is integrated with the Shopify
 Payments Account. Upon your acceptance of the terms of service of
 such substitute payment processor, they shall be deemed to have
 replaced the previous Processor contemplated herein, provided that
 your liabilities to such Processor herein shall not be diminished
 on account of accepting the terms of the substitute payment
 processor.
Effects of Termination
Upon termination and closing of your Shopify Payments Account, 
 we will immediately discontinue your access to the Payments 
 Services. You agree to complete all pending Transactions, 
 immediately remove all logos for Cards, and stop accepting new 
 Transactions through the Payments Services. You will not be 
 refunded the remainder of any Fees that you have paid for
 the Payments Services if your access to or use of the Payments
 Services is terminated or suspended. Any funds in the Financial
 Services Provider’s custody will be paid out to you subject to 
 the Processor Terms.
Termination does not relieve you of your obligations as defined
 in this Agreement, and a Processor may elect to continue to
 hold any funds deemed necessary, pending resolution of any other
 terms or obligations defined in this Agreement, including, but
 not limited to, chargebacks, fees, refunds, or other
 investigations or proceedings.
Termination of this Agreement will not necessarily terminate
 your Shopify Platform Terms, unless Shopify determines
 otherwise.
Upon termination you agree: (i) to immediately cease your use of
 the Payments Services; (ii) to discontinue use of any Shopify or
 Processor trademarks and to immediately remove any Shopify or
 Processor references and logos from your website and/or physical
 location, if applicable; (iii) that the license granted under
 this Agreement shall end; (iv) that we reserve the right (but
 have no obligation) to delete all of your information and
 account data stored on our servers; (v) that we will not be
 liable to you for compensation, reimbursement, or damages in
 connection with your use of the Payments Services, or any
 termination or suspension of the Payments Services, or deletion
 of your information or account data; and, (vi) that you will
 still be liable to us for any fees or fines, or other financial
 obligation incurred by you or through your use of the Payments
 Services prior to termination.
Ownership
The Payments Services are licensed and not
 sold. We reserve all rights not expressly granted to you in this
 Agreement. The Payments Services are protected by copyright,
 trade secret, and other intellectual property laws. We own the
 title, copyright, and other worldwide Intellectual Property
 Rights (as defined below) in the Payments Services and all
 copies of the Payments Services. This Agreement does not grant
 you any rights to our trademarks or service marks.
For the purposes of this Agreement, “Intellectual Property
 Rights" means all patent rights, copyright rights, mask work
 rights, moral rights, rights of publicity, trademark, trade
 dress and service mark rights, goodwill, trade secret rights and
 other intellectual property rights as may now exist or hereafter
 come into existence, and all applications therefore and
 registrations, renewals and extensions thereof, under the laws
 of any state, country, territory or other jurisdiction.
You may choose to, or we may invite you to submit comments or
 ideas about the Payments Services, including, without
 limitation, about how to improve the Payments Services or our
 products (“Ideas”). By submitting any Idea you agree that your
 disclosure is gratuitous, unsolicited and without restriction,
 and will not place us under any fiduciary or other obligation,
 and that we are free to use the Idea without any additional
 compensation to you, and/or to disclose the Idea on a
 non-confidential basis or otherwise to anyone. You further
 acknowledge that, by acceptance of your submission, we do not
 waive any rights to use similar or related ideas previously
 known to us, or developed by our employees, or obtained from
 sources other than you.
Your Liability and Indemnification Concerning Liabilities
Nothing in this Agreement shall serve to diminish
 your liability under the Processor Terms or Shopify Platform
 Terms. You are obliged to fulfill your obligations under this
 Agreement and those under the Processor Terms and Shopify
 Platform Terms.
Shopify has agreed to indemnify and hold the Processors harmless
 for some, and, in some cases, all of your liabilities occurring
 under the Processor Terms, including, but not limited to, disputes
 (including, but not limited to, chargebacks), refunds, reversals,
 returns and fines (as such terms are defined in the Processor
 Terms). Insofar as Shopify becomes liable to a Processor or any
 other third party for any penalties, fines, fees, or other
 liabilities under or in respect of the Processor Terms, the
 Payments Services, the Payment Processing services, or the Payment
 Network Rules, you agree to indemnify and hold Shopify harmless
 from and against any and all such liabilities.
Additionally, we may require a personal guarantee from a
 principal of a business for funds owed under this Agreement.
You agree to indemnify and defend Shopify, our affiliates, and
 their respective employees, agents and service providers (each,
 a “Shopify Entity”) against any claim, suit, demand, loss,
 liability, damage, action, or proceeding (each, a “Claim”)
 brought by a third party against a Shopify Entity, and you agree
 to fully reimburse the Shopify Entities for any Claims that
 result from: (i) your breach of any provision of this Agreement;
 (ii) any fees, fines, penalties, disputes, reversals, returns,
 chargebacks (as such terms are defined in the Processor Terms),
 or any other liability we incur that results from your use of
 the Payments Services; (iii) negligent or willful misconduct of
 your owners, employees, contractors, or agents; (iv) contractual
 or other relationships between you and your customers; or, (v)
 third-party indemnity obligations we incur as a direct or
 indirect result of your acts or omissions, including, but not
 limited to, indemnification of any Processor or any Payment
 Network.
We will have the final decision-making authority with respect to
 Claims, including, without limitation, claims for refunds for
 purchased items that are filed with us by you or your customers.
 You will be required to reimburse us for your liability. Your
 liability will include the full purchase price of the item plus
 the original shipping cost (and in some cases you may not
 receive the item back). You will not receive a refund of any
 Fees paid to us.
If you are liable for any amounts owed to us, we may immediately
 remove such amounts from a Reserve Account and deduct the amounts
 owed to us from such Reserve Account funds. If you do not have
 sufficient funds in a Reserve Account to cover your liability, you
 will be required to immediately add additional funds to such
 Reserve Account to cover funds owed to us. If you do not do so, we
 may engage in collections efforts to recover such amounts from you
 at your cost and expense.
Your Representations, Warranties and Covenants
You represent and warrant to us that: (i) if you are a sole
 proprietor, you are at least eighteen (18) years of age or, if
 you are a corporation or other entity, that the person entering
 into this Agreement on your behalf is at least eighteen (18)
 years of age, is authorized to act on your behalf, and has the
 authority to bind you to this Agreement; (ii) you are eligible
 to register and use the Payments Services and have the right,
 power, and ability to enter into and perform under this
 Agreement; (iii) the name identified by you when you registered
 is your name or business name under which you sell goods and
 services and the information that you have provided to us is
 accurate and complete; (iv) you are not a member of an organized
 crime group, a party who has been a member of an organized crime
 group in the past five years, a quasi-member of an organized
 crime group, a corporate racketeer, or other similar party, nor
 are any of your officers or employees a member of the foregoing;
 and, (v) you will not carry out, nor use a third party to carry
 out, any of the following unlawful acts: (a) the act of making
 violent demands; (b) the act of making unreasonable demands
 exceeding legal responsibilities; (c) the act of using
 threatening behavior or violence in relation to a transaction;
 (d) the act of spreading rumors, using fraudulent means, or
 using force to harm the other party’s reputation or obstruct the
 party’s business; (e) the act of selling products for the
 purpose of money laundering; (f) the act of using a Card held by
 you for a sale without reasonable grounds or another act similar
 to those set forth in (a) through (f).
You hereby covenant to us that: (i) any Transactions submitted
 by you will represent a bona fide sale by you; (ii) any
 Transaction submitted by you will accurately describe the goods
 and/or services sold and delivered to a customer; (iii) you will
 fulfill all of your obligations to each customer for which you
 submit a Transaction and will resolve any disputes or complaints
 directly with your customers; (iv) you and all Transactions
 initiated by you will comply with all applicable laws, rules,
 and regulations applicable to your business, including, but not
 limited to, any applicable tax laws and regulations; (v) except
 in the ordinary course of business, no Transaction submitted by
 you through the Payments Services will represent a sale to any
 principal, partner, proprietor, or owner of your entity; (vi)
 you will not use the Payments Services, directly or indirectly,
 for any fraudulent undertaking or in any manner so as to
 interfere with the use of the Payments Services; and, (vii) any
 information you provide to us will be accurate and complete.
NO WARRANTIES
THE PAYMENTS SERVICES AND ALL ACCOMPANYING
 DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED ON AN “AS IS" AND “AS AVAILABLE"
 BASIS, WITHOUT ANY WARRANTIES, EITHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED, OR
 STATUTORY, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY IMPLIED WARRANTIES
 OF TITLE, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AND
 NON-INFRINGEMENT. USE OF THE PAYMENTS SERVICES IS AT YOUR OWN
 RISK.
NO ADVICE OR INFORMATION, WHETHER ORAL OR WRITTEN, OBTAINED BY
 YOU FROM OR THROUGH THE PAYMENTS SERVICES OR FROM: (I) SHOPIFY;
 (II) A PROCESSOR, SUPPLIERS OR LICENSORS OF SHOPIFY OR A 
 PROCESSOR; OR, (III) ANY OF THE RESPECTIVE AFFILIATES, AGENTS,
 DIRECTORS, AND EMPLOYEES OF ANY OF THE ENTITIES LISTED IN (I) OR
 (II) ABOVE (COLLECTIVELY, THE “DISCLAIMING ENTITIES" AND
 INDIVIDUALLY, A “DISCLAIMING ENTITY”), WILL CREATE ANY WARRANTY.
 YOU SPECIFICALLY ACKNOWLEDGE THAT WE DO NOT HAVE ANY CONTROL
 OVER THE PRODUCTS OR SERVICES THAT ARE PAID FOR WITH THE
 PAYMENTS SERVICES, AND WE CANNOT ENSURE THAT YOUR CUSTOMERS WILL
 COMPLETE A TRANSACTION OR ARE AUTHORIZED TO DO SO.
WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, THE DISCLAIMING ENTITIES DO NOT
 WARRANT THAT: (I) THE INFORMATION THEY PROVIDE OR THAT IS
 PROVIDED THROUGH THE PAYMENTS SERVICES IS ACCURATE, RELIABLE OR
 CORRECT; (II) THE PAYMENTS SERVICES WILL MEET YOUR REQUIREMENTS;
 (III) THE PAYMENTS SERVICES WILL BE AVAILABLE AT ANY PARTICULAR
 TIME OR LOCATION; (IV) THE PAYMENTS SERVICES WILL FUNCTION IN AN
 UNINTERRUPTED MANNER OR BE SECURE; (V) ANY DEFECTS OR ERRORS
 WILL BE CORRECTED; OR, (VI) THE PAYMENTS SERVICES ARE FREE OF
 VIRUSES OR OTHER HARMFUL COMPONENTS.
ANY SUBJECT MATTER DOWNLOADED OR OTHERWISE OBTAINED THROUGH THE
 USE OF THE PAYMENTS SERVICES IS DOWNLOADED AT YOUR OWN RISK AND
 YOU WILL BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE FOR ANY DAMAGE TO YOUR PROPERTY
 OR LOSS OF DATA THAT RESULTS FROM SUCH DOWNLOAD. THE DISCLAIMING
 ENTITIES MAKE NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES ABOUT HOW LONG
 WILL BE NEEDED TO COMPLETE THE PROCESSING OF A TRANSACTION.
THE DISCLAIMING ENTITIES DO NOT WARRANT, ENDORSE, GUARANTEE, OR
 ASSUME RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY PRODUCT OR SERVICE ADVERTISED OR
 OFFERED BY A THIRD PARTY THROUGH THE PAYMENTS SERVICES, OR ANY
 HYPERLINKED WEBSITE OR SERVICE, OR FEATURED IN ANY BANNER OR
 OTHER ADVERTISING, AND NEITHER SHOPIFY, THE PROCESSORS, NOR THE
 FINANCIAL SERVICES PROVIDERS WILL BE A PARTY TO, OR IN ANY WAY
 MONITOR ANY TRANSACTION BETWEEN YOU AND THIRD-PARTY PROVIDERS OF
 PRODUCTS OR SERVICES.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY AND DAMAGES
IN NO EVENT SHALL A
 DISCLAIMING ENTITY (AS DEFINED ABOVE) BE LIABLE FOR ANY LOST
 PROFITS, LOSS OF DATA, OR ANY INDIRECT, PUNITIVE, INCIDENTAL,
 SPECIAL, CONSEQUENTIAL OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF, IN
 CONNECTION WITH, OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE PAYMENTS
 SERVICES, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, THE USE OF, INABILITY
 TO USE, OR UNAVAILABILITY OF THE PAYMENTS SERVICES. UNDER NO
 CIRCUMSTANCES WILL ANY OF THE DISCLAIMING ENTITIES BE
 RESPONSIBLE FOR ANY DAMAGE, LOSS OR INJURY RESULTING FROM
 HACKING, TAMPERING OR OTHER UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS OR USE OF THE
 PAYMENTS SERVICES OR YOUR SHOPIFY PAYMENTS ACCOUNT, OR THE
 INFORMATION CONTAINED THEREIN.
THE DISCLAIMING ENTITIES ASSUME NO LIABILITY OR RESPONSIBILITY
 FOR ANY: (I) PERSONAL INJURY OR PROPERTY DAMAGE OF ANY NATURE
 WHATSOEVER, RESULTING FROM YOUR ACCESS TO OR USE OF THE PAYMENTS
 SERVICES; (II) ANY UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO OR USE OF SERVERS USED
 IN CONNECTION WITH THE PAYMENTS SERVICES AND/OR ANY AND ALL
 PERSONAL INFORMATION STORED THEREIN; (III) ANY INTERRUPTION OR
 CESSATION OF TRANSMISSION TO OR FROM THE PAYMENTS SERVICES; (IV)
 ANY SOFTWARE BUGS, VIRUSES, TROJAN HORSES, OR OTHER HARMFUL CODE
 THAT MAY BE TRANSMITTED TO OR THROUGH THE PAYMENTS SERVICES; (V)
 ANY ERRORS, INACCURACIES OR OMISSIONS IN ANY CONTENT OR
 INFORMATION, FOR ANY LOSS OR DAMAGE INCURRED AS A RESULT OF THE
 USE OF ANY CONTENT OR INFORMATION, IN EACH CASE POSTED, EMAILED,
 STORED, TRANSMITTED, OR OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH THE
 PAYMENTS SERVICES; AND/OR (VI) USER CONTENT OR THE DEFAMATORY,
 OFFENSIVE, OR ILLEGAL CONDUCT OF ANY THIRD PARTY.
WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION D8,
 THE DISCLAIMING ENTITIES’ CUMULATIVE LIABILITY TO YOU SHALL BE
 LIMITED TO DIRECT DAMAGES, AND IN ALL EVENTS SHALL NOT EXCEED IN
 THE AGGREGATE THE AMOUNT OF FEES PAID BY YOU TO SHOPIFY DURING
 THE THREE (3) MONTH PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT
 GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM FOR LIABILITY.
THIS LIMITATION OF LIABILITY SECTION APPLIES REGARDLESS OF THE
 LEGAL THEORY ON WHICH THE CLAIM IS BASED, INCLUDING, WITHOUT
 LIMITATION, CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), STRICT
 LIABILITY, OR ANY OTHER BASIS. THE LIMITATIONS APPLY EVEN IF
 SHOPIFY OR A PROCESSOR HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF
 SUCH DAMAGE.
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION D8 SHALL APPLY TO THE FULLEST
 EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW IN THE APPLICABLE JURISDICTION.
The Payments Services are controlled and operated from
 facilities in Canada and the United States. We make no
 representations that the Payments Services are appropriate or
 available for use in other locations. Those who access or use
 the Payments Services from other jurisdictions do so at their
 own volition and are entirely responsible for compliance with
 all applicable United States, Canada, foreign and local laws and
 regulations, including, but not limited to, export and import
 regulations. You may not use the Payments Services if you are a
 resident of a sanctioned country embargoed by the United States,
 Canada, or the European Union, or are a foreign person or entity
 blocked or denied by the governments of the United States,
 Canada or the European Union.
Disputes, Choice of Law, Jurisdiction, Venue and Miscellaneous
You agree that any disputes arising out of or
 relating to this Agreement or the Payments Services shall be
 resolved in accordance with this Section D9.
This Agreement is governed by the laws of Delaware except for any
 security interest created pursuant to Section C2 above, which
 will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of
 the applicable country, state, province, territory, or other
 jurisdiction in which such security interest is registered, and
 in each case without regard to its choice of law provisions to
 the contrary. The exclusive venue for any actions or claims
 arising under or related to this Agreement shall be a court of
 competent jurisdiction in Delaware.
Shopify may, or may direct the applicable Processor to respond to
 and comply with any subpoena, warrant, or other legal order
 (“Legal Process”) that we believe to be valid. Such Processor or
 any applicable Financial Services Provider may deliver or hold any
 funds or any Data as required under such Legal Process, even if
 you are receiving funds or Data on behalf of other parties.
 Where permitted by law, we will make reasonable efforts to
 provide you notice of such Legal Process by sending a copy to
 the email address we have on file for you. We are not
 responsible for any losses, whether direct or indirect, that you
 may incur as a result of our response or compliance with a Legal
 Process.
Headings are included for convenience only and shall not be
 considered in interpreting this Agreement. The Agreement does
 not limit any rights that we may have under trade secret,
 copyright, patent, or other laws. Our failure to assert any
 right or provision under this Agreement shall not constitute a
 waiver of such right or provision. No waiver of any term of this
 Agreement shall be deemed a further or continuing waiver of such
 term or any other term.
Right to Amend
We have the right to change or add to
the terms of this Agreement at any time, and to change, delete,
discontinue, or impose conditions on any feature or aspect of
the Payments Services or software with notice that we in our
sole discretion deem to be reasonable in the circumstances,
including such notice in your Shopify Admin, or any other
website maintained or owned by us for the purposes of providing
services in terms of this Agreement. Any use of the Payments
Services after our publication of any such changes shall
constitute your acceptance of this Agreement as modified.
Assignment
This Agreement, and any rights and licenses
granted hereunder, may not be transferred or assigned by you
without our prior written consent, but may be assigned by us
without consent or other restriction.
Change of Business
You agree to give us at least thirty
(30) days prior notification of your intent to change your
current product or services types, your business or trade name,
or the manner in which you accept payment. You agree to provide
us with prompt notification within three (3) days if you are the
subject of any voluntary or involuntary bankruptcy or insolvency
application, petition or proceeding, receivership, bankruptcy,
or similar action or proceeding initiated by or against you or
any of your principals (any of the foregoing, a “Bankruptcy
Proceeding”). You also agree to promptly notify us within three
(3) days of any adverse change in your financial condition, any
planned or anticipated liquidation or substantial change in the
basic nature of your business, any transfer or sale of
twenty-five percent (25%) or more of your total assets, or any
change in the control or ownership of your or your parent
entity. You will also notify us within three (3) days of any
judgment, writ, warrant of attachment or execution, or levy
against twenty-five percent (25%) or more of your total assets.
You will include us on the list and matrix of creditors as filed
with any bankruptcy, commercial or civil court in connection
with any Bankruptcy Proceeding, whether or not a claim may exist
at the time of filing. Failure to do so will be cause for
immediate termination of this Agreement and shall allow the
pursuit of any other action available to us under the applicable
Payment Network Rules or law.
Parties
This Agreement binds you and your respective
heirs, representatives, and permitted and approved successors
(including those by merger and acquisition), or any permitted
assigns.
Third-Party Services and Links to Other Web Sites
You may be offered services, products, and promotions provided by
third parties and not by us. If you decide to use these
third-party services, you will be responsible for reviewing and
understanding the terms and conditions associated with these
services. You agree that we are not responsible for the
performance of these services. The Shopify website may contain
links to third-party websites as a convenience to you. The
inclusion of any website link does not imply an approval,
endorsement, or recommendation by us. You agree that your access
to any such website is at your own risk, and that the site is
not governed by the terms and conditions contained in this
Agreement. We expressly disclaim any liability for these
websites. Please remember that when you use a link to go from
our website to another website, our Privacy Policy is no longer
in effect. Your browsing and interaction on any other website,
including those that have a link on our website, is subject to
that website’s own rules and policies.
Force Majeure
No party will be liable for delays in
processing or other non-performance caused by such events as
fires, telecommunications failures, utility failures, power
failures, equipment failures, labor strife, riots, war,
terrorist attack, non-performance of our vendors or suppliers,
acts of God, or other causes over which the respective party has
no reasonable control, except that nothing in this section will
affect or excuse your liabilities and obligations under Sections
C1 or D5, including, without limitation, for reversals,
chargebacks, claims, fines, fees, refunds or unfulfilled
products and services.
Entire Agreement and Remedies
These terms and
conditions, and all policies and procedures that are
incorporated herein by reference, constitute the entire
agreement between you and Shopify with respect to the provision
of the Payments Services. Except as otherwise set out herein, in
the event of a conflict between this Agreement and any other
Shopify or Processor agreement or policy, this Agreement shall
prevail on the subject matter of this Agreement. Except as
expressly provided in this Agreement, these terms describe the
entire liability of Shopify and our vendors and suppliers and
sets forth your exclusive remedies with respect to the Payments
Services and your access and use of the Payments Services. If
any provision of this Agreement (or portion thereof) is held to
be invalid or unenforceable under applicable law, then it shall
be changed and interpreted to accomplish the objectives of such
provision to the greatest extent possible under applicable law,
and the remaining provisions will continue in full force and
effect.
This Agreement has been reviewed by you with the benefit of
independent legal counsel to the extent you consider necessary,
and any rule of construction to the effect that ambiguities are
to be resolved against the drafting party shall not apply to the
construction or interpretation of this Agreement. The rights
conferred upon us in this Agreement are not intended to be
exclusive of each other or of any other rights and remedies we
may have at law or in equity. Rather, each and every right we
may have under this Agreement, at law or in equity, is
cumulative and concurrent, and in addition to every other right.
This Agreement may be available in languages other than English.
To the extent of any inconsistencies or conflicts between this
English Agreement and the Agreements available in another
language, the most current English version of the Agreement will
prevail.
Survival
In addition to any provision that is
reasonably necessary to accomplish or enforce the purpose of
this Agreement, the following sections of this Agreement survive
and remain in effect in accordance with their terms upon the
termination of this Agreement: Sections A7 Payment Methods; A9
Taxes; A11 Security; A12 Data Security; A13 Audit Right; A14
Privacy; A15 Privacy of Others; A16 Restricted Use; A17
Suspicion of Unauthorized or Illegal Use; A18 Payment Network
Rules; A19 Disclosures and Notices; A20 Automatic Reminders;
Section C Processing Card Transactions and Receiving Your Funds;
in its entirety; and, Section D Termination and Other General
Legal Terms in its entirety.
We use cookies (and other similar technologies) for many purposes, including to improve your experience on our site and for ads and analytics. Click "Accept all" to accept these uses. Read more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Reject all
Accept all